Alabama, session 2026rs, SB141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
20 Section 1. There is hereby appropriated for the support
21 of public education in Alabama for the fiscal year ending
22 September 30, 2027, for debt service, and for capital outlay
23 to be paid out of funds specified in subsection (a) of Section
24 2 of this act and the amounts specified in subsections (a),
25 (b), (c), (d), and (e) of Section 3 of this act. For the
26 purpose specified in subsection (b) of Section 2 of this act,
27 amounts are shown by programmatic area and the total for all
Page 1

amounts are shown by programmatic area and the total for all
SB141 INTRODUCED
28 programs is shown so as to include estimated sources of funds
29 other than those listed in subsection (a) of Section 2 of this
30 act. For the purpose of this act, "ETF" shall mean the
31 Education Trust Fund and "Federal and Local Funds" shall mean
32 all gifts, grants, contributions, or entitlements, including
33 grants by the Congress of the United States, municipalities or
34 counties.
35 Section 2. (a) The appropriations provided for in this
36 act shall be paid from funds in the State Treasury to the
37 credit of the Education Trust Fund, Alabama Peace Officers'
38 Standards and Training Fund, Impaired Drivers Trust Fund,
39 Driver Education and Training Fund, Special Education
40 Catastrophic Fund, Public School Fund and other listed funds
41 and are hereby made for the support of public education in
42 Alabama for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, and the
43 appropriations herein made shall be subject to the provisions,
44 terms, conditions and limitations of the Budget and Financial
45 Control Act (Code of Alabama 1975, Sections 41-4-80 et seq.),
46 the provisions of the Budget Management Act of 1976 (Code of
47 Alabama 1975, Sections 41-19-1 et seq.), and shall be in the
48 amounts hereinafter specified.
49 (b) Amounts shown hereinunder the columns "Other Funds"
50 and "Total" are as set forth for the purpose of establishing
51 amounts estimated to be available by programmatic area from
52 sources other than those listed in subsection (a) of this
53 Section 2, in order, upon consideration of such other funds so
54 estimated to be available, to promote the accountability for
Page 2

estimated to be available, to promote the accountability for
SB141 INTRODUCED
55 an efficient use of funds available, and the same are hereby
56 appropriated by the Legislature. Provided, however, that
57 regardless of the ending date of any pay period which has been
58 or may be established by the Legislature for the payment of
59 salaries of state employees, the entire payment due shall be
60 made from the fiscal year's appropriation in which the pay
61 date falls.
62 (c) All appropriations made in Section 3 shall be at
63 the program level. Any directed expenditure of funds below a
64 program shall be from funds appropriated for the program.
Page 3

program shall be from funds appropriated for the program.
SB141 INTRODUCED
65 Section 3.
66 Education
67 Trust Fund Other Funds Total
68 A. Legislative Branch:
69 1. Examiners of Public Accounts:
70 (a) Audit Services Program 11,534,850 11,534,850
71 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
72 (1) ETF 11,534,850
73 Total Examiners of Public Accounts 11,534,850 11,534,850
74 The Department of Examiners of Public Accounts is hereby authorized to examine as
75 deemed necessary all appropriations herein made for compliance with the laws of the
76 State of Alabama. Any examination performed shall be in accordance with the
77 provisions of Title 41, Chapter 5A, Code of Alabama 1975.
78 2. Legislative Services Agency:
79 (a) Legislative Operations and 4,228,466 4,228,466
80 Support Program
81 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
82 (1) ETF 4,228,466
83 Total Legislative Services Agency 4,228,466 4,228,466
84 3. Legislature :
85 (a) Legislative Operations and 4,320,480 4,320,480
86 Support Program
87 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
88 (1) ETF 4,320,480
89 Total Legislature 4,320,480 4,320,480
90 B. Executive Branch:
91 1. Agriculture and Industries,
92 Department of:
93 (a) Agricultural Development Services 600,000 600,000
94 Program
95 (1) Farm to School Program 600,000
Page 4

(1) Farm to School Program 600,000
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
96 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
97 (1) ETF 600,000
98 Total Agriculture and Industries, 600,000 600,000
99 Department of
100 2. American Legion and Auxiliary
101 Scholarships:
102 (a) Financial Assistance Program, 112,500 112,500
103 Estimated
104 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
105 (1) ETF 112,500
106 Total American Legion and Auxiliary 112,500 112,500
107 Scholarships
108 To be expended under the provisions of Sections 16-31-1 through 16-31-4, Code of
109 Alabama 1975.
110 3. Archives and History, Department
111 of:
112 (a) Historical Resources Management 8,129,838 8,129,838
113 Program
114 (1) Men's Hall of Fame 10,000
115 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
116 (1) ETF 8,129,838
117 Total Archives and History, Department 8,129,838 8,129,838
118 of
119 The above appropriation shall be expended to support the educational functions of
120 the Department of Archives and History.
121 4. Arts, State Council on the:
122 (a) Fine Arts Program 8,518,983 1,100,000 9,618,983
123 (1) Alabama Center for the Arts 1,410,000
124 a. Alabama Center for the Arts Foundation 635,000
125 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
Page 5

SOURCE OF FUNDS:
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
126 (1) ETF 8,518,983
127 (2) Federal and Local Funds 1,100,000
128 Total Arts, State Council on the 8,518,983 1,100,000 9,618,983
129 5. Charter School Commission, Alabama
130 Public:
131 (a) Administrative Services Program 1,517,428 29,964,656 31,482,084
132 (1) New Schools for Alabama 400,000
133 The above appropriation shall be expended for public charter school startup funding grants,
134 which shall be distributed on a competitive basis to high-quality public charter school
135 applicants.
136 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
137 (1) ETF 1,517,428
138 (2) Federal and Local Funds 29,964,656
139 Total Charter School Commission, 1,517,428 29,964,656 31,482,084
140 Alabama Public
141 6. Child Abuse and Neglect Prevention,
142 Department of:
143 (a) Social Services Program 10,059,016 10,059,016
144 In accordance with Sections 26-16-1 et seq., Code of Alabama 1975.
145 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
146 (1) ETF-Transfer 10,059,016
147 Total Child Abuse and Neglect 10,059,016 10,059,016
148 Prevention, Department of
149 7. Commerce, Department of:
150 (a) Industrial Development Training 71,190,570 71,190,570
151 Institute Program
152 (1) Industrial Development and Training 8,880,976
153 Program
154 (2) Industrial Training Program - 9,246,943
155 Operations and Maintenance
Page 6

9,246,943
Operations and Maintenance
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
156 (3) Rural Marketing Program 400,000
157 To feature products from Alabama companies in rural counties.
158 (4) Workforce Development 52,662,651
159 a. Alabama Workforce Training Center 500,000
160 b. Modern Manufacturing Project 1,239,840
161 c. West Alabama Works Center for Modern 1,600,000
162 Manufacturing
163 To provide for the expansion of the program to all workforce regions of the state.
164 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
165 (1) ETF 71,190,570
166 Total Commerce, Department of 71,190,570 71,190,570
Page 7

Total Commerce, Department of 71,190,570 71,190,570
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
167 The funds appropriated for Workforce Development are to be expended for those costs
168 incurred by the State in honoring commitments to pay workforce development costs,
169 including services and other assistance and expenses of recruitment and training of
170 a company's workforce, that are undertaken to induce companies to locate and expand
171 their operations in Alabama (described hereinafter as a "Project") and to develop
172 and implement training, placement and recruitment programs that will improve
173 development and expand the State's workforce. Such costs include, but are not
174 limited to: (i) AIDT operating costs directly related to a Project; (ii) wages and
175 benefits for trainers engaged by AIDT for the purpose of a Project; (iii) costs
176 which the State has agreed to pay under the terms of a Project Agreement with a
177 company that are necessary and reasonable charges incurred by the company or its
178 affiliates for personnel providing training to the company's employees, whether
179 those trainers are employees of the company or its vendors or suppliers, including
180 wages, benefits and travel (domestic and, when necessary, international); (iv) any
181 necessary materials, equipment, manuals, or other relevant training materials; (v)
182 the costs incurred for purchasing or repairing or replacing training tools and
183 equipment; (vi) costs incurred for the purchase or construction and maintenance of
184 training facilities; (vii) travel expenses for prospective and current employees and
185 trainees, including travel, food, lodging, relocation, and other costs necessary and
186 reasonable to enable the company to secure a qualified workforce; and (viii) outside
187 training fees. The above funds appropriated for Workforce Development shall be
188 expended primarily for the training of Alabama residents. It is further the intent
189 that contracts with vendors to provide workforce training shall be inclusive and
190 reflect the racial and gender diversity of the State. The Secretary of the
191 Department of Commerce shall report semi-annually to the Chairs of the Senate
192 Committee on Finance and Taxation-Education, the House Ways and Means-Education
193 Committee, the Finance Director, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer any funds
194 allocated for workforce training. Such report shall include a summary of the persons
195 trained and the vendors providing the training. The report shall contain information
196 including the residence, race and gender of the persons trained and of the principal
197 or majority owner of the firm or business contracted with to provide the training
198 services.
Page 8

services.
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
199 8. Community College System Board of
200 Trustees, Alabama :
201 (a) Operations and Maintenance 471,834,095 15,551,821 487,385,916
202 The above appropriation from the Education Trust Fund for Operations and
203 Maintenance shall be distributed as provided below. The remainder shall be
204 distributed to each of the colleges based on a distribution model consistent
205 with the recommendations in the final report of the Alabama Community College
206 Advisory Council on Outcomes-Based Funding, except Marion Military Institute.
207 The below amounts are intended to provide a minimum of $125/FTE to each
208 college based on Fall 2025 figures.
209 (1) Alabama Aviation College 370,000
210 a. Andalusia Program 120,000
211 (2) Bevill State Community College 280,000
212 a. Fayette Campus 70,000
213 b. Hamilton Campus 70,000
214 c. Jasper Campus 70,000
215 d. Sumiton Campus 70,000
216 (3) Bishop State Community College 183,625
217 For building renovation and the welding program at Carver Campus.
218 (4) Coastal Alabama Community College 552,125
219 For the technology and manufacturing program.
220 (5) Calhoun Community College 595,875
221 For the expansion of the Alabama Center for the Arts.
222 (6) Central Alabama Community College 145,000
223 For economic development.
224 (7) Chattahoochee Valley Community College 104,750
225 For Applied Technology Program/Career Discovery.
226 (8) Drake State Community Technical College 250,000
227 For campus modifications.
228 (9) Enterprise State Community College 250,000
229 (10) Gadsden State Community College 342,500
Page 9

(10) Gadsden State Community College 342,500
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
230 a. Poultry Technology Center 100,000
231 In partnership with Auburn University.
232 b. For economic development. 242,500
233 (11) Ingram State Technical College 100,000
234 (12) Jefferson State Community College 652,625
235 For the nursing program.
236 (13) Lawson State Community College 240,750
237 For STEM education
238 (14) Lurleen B. Wallace Community College 200,000
239 For Workforce Development.
240 (15) Northeast Alabama Community College 200,000
241 (16) Northwest-Shoals Community College 450,000
242 For the Lauderdale County Workforce Center and Acquisition and Construction Program.
243 (17) Reid State Technical College 30,125
244 (18) Shelton State Community College 350,000
245 a. Distance Support 100,000
246 b. Facility Modification 250,000
247 (19) Snead State Community College 225,000
248 For the Aeronautics School in Albertville.
249 (20) Southern Union State Community College 356,125
250 (21) Trenholm State Community College 213,250
251 (22) Wallace Community College-Dothan 278,875
252 For the Center for Economic and Workforce Development.
253 (23) Wallace Community College-Selma 175,000
254 For the Excellence in Education to Employment Pipeline.
255 (24) Wallace State Community 427,875
256 College-Hanceville
257 For the Aviation Program.
258 (25) Step increases for 30-year employees 1,007,581
259 (b) Auxiliary Enterprises 15,334,968 15,334,968
Page 10

(b) Auxiliary Enterprises 15,334,968 15,334,968
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
260 (c) Restricted Funds 372,557,947 372,557,947
261 (d) Operations and Maintenance for 23,776,380 23,776,380
262 Postsecondary Prison Education
263 (1) Perry County Facility 2,500,000
264 (2) Therapeutic Education 1,999,901
265 (3) LifeTech Institute in Thomasville 2,000,000
266 For operations and maintenance.
267 (4) Day Reporting Center pilot program 1,000,000
268 (e) Adult Education Program 14,964,656 10,217,797 25,182,453
269 The allocation of Adult Education funds appropriated herein is restricted to
270 the provision of services to individuals who are receiving benefits under the
271 Adult Education and Family Literacy Act, Title II of the federal Workforce
272 Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014.
273 (f) Special Populations Training 4,725,281 4,725,281
274 The above appropriation shall be expended for education and training programs
275 to prepare individuals designated as special populations, as determined by the
276 Chancellor, for entry into the workforce through pre-employment skills
277 training, and intensive career technical training.
278 (g) Mine Safety Training Program at 375,000 375,000
279 Bevill State Community College
280 (h) Postsecondary Education 15,423,073 22,387,615 37,810,688
281 Department - Administration
282 (1) Property and Capital Purchases and 850,000
283 Improvements
284 (i) Postsecondary/Tech Colleges - 265,790 2,000,000 2,265,790
285 Truck Driver Training
286 The above appropriation from earmarked funds is estimated and shall be
287 expended pursuant to Section 32-5-313, Code of Alabama 1975.
288 (1) Truck Driver Training Program at 265,790
289 Central Alabama Community College
Page 11

265,790
Central Alabama Community College
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
290 (j) Industry Certification 9,640,408 9,640,408
291 Initiatives
292 Industry Certification Initiatives funds shall be distributed by the Alabama
293 Community College System Board of Trustees. The Chancellor of the Alabama
294 Community College System shall report semi-annually to the Chairs of the
295 Senate Committee on Finance and Taxation-Education, the House Ways and
296 Means-Education Committee, the Finance Director, and the Legislative Fiscal
297 Officer any funds expended for industry certification initiatives.
298 (1) Career Coaches 3,079,630
299 (2) Workforce Development Initiatives 3,750,000
300 (k) Marion Military Institute 12,834,349 12,834,349
301 (1) Military Hall of Honor 125,000
302 (l) Alabama Technology Network 6,167,736 6,167,736
303 (1) Workforce Training 503,906
304 (m) Dual Enrollment 54,432,385 10,000,000 64,432,385
305 The remaining appropriation shall be expended at the direction of the
306 Chancellor of the Alabama Community College System to continue, expand, and
307 develop a dual enrollment scholarship program for academic and
308 career-technical education programs. The Chancellor will work with business
309 and industry partners to allocate the funds in a manner consistent with
310 addressing identified needs in the State of Alabama. Such allocations will
311 further and/or accommodate the continuation and expansion of dual enrollment
312 programs.
313 (1) Dual Enrollment Program at Murphy 200,000
314 University Center
315 To be available to students in the state.
316 (n) Science, Technology, Engineering, 900,000 900,000
317 Arts and Math (STEAM) Pilot
318 Project
319 (o) The Women's Foundation of Alabama 750,000 750,000
Page 12

(o) The Women's Foundation of Alabama 750,000 750,000
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
320 The above appropriation shall be expended to support students in obtaining
321 certifications and post-secondary degrees, to aid in scholarships, support
322 services including transportation, tuition and fees, and academic support
323 services. This appropriation is contingent upon the Women's Foundation of
324 Alabama providing a match of private funding and programmatic supports of
325 $400,000. The Foundation shall file a report no later than December 31, 2027
326 to the Governor and the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Finance and
327 Taxation-Education and the House Ways and Means-Education Committee detailing
328 the costs, benefits, and economic impacts on the Fund.
329 (p) Volunteer EMSP Certifications 125,000 125,000
330 Pursuant to Sections 22-18-60, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975.
331 (q) Automotive Workforce Training 400,000 400,000
332 Scholarship Program
333 The Board of Trustees of the Alabama Community College System, in consultation
334 with the Alabama Industrial Development and Training Institute, shall
335 establish qualifications for the award of scholarships to high school students
336 and adults enrolled in a state educational program relating to the automotive
337 manufacturing industry and shall further provide for the implementation and
338 administration of the scholarships. Scholarship recipients shall be selected
339 by the Board, in consultation with a scholarship committee, comprised of
340 members of the Board of Directors of the Alabama Automotive Manufacturers
341 Association, from applications submitted to the association. The Board shall
342 file a report with the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Finance and
343 Taxation-Education, the House Ways and Means-Education Committee, the
344 Legislative Fiscal Officer, and the Finance Director on September 30, 2027
345 regarding the total number of scholarships awarded for the Fall term of the
346 2026-2027 academic year and the institution attended by the scholarship
347 recipients. The report shall also include the name of each scholarship
348 recipient and the number of years the recipient has received a scholarship.
349 (r) Distance Learning Program 3,375,000 3,375,000
Page 13

(r) Distance Learning Program 3,375,000 3,375,000
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
350 (s) Automotive Manufacturing 312,500 312,500
351 Workforce Development Program
352 (t) Smart Career Workforce Project 200,000 200,000
353 The above appropriation shall be expended to promote smart careers, support
354 soft skill development through engagement opportunities for youth, develop and
355 implement an effective smart career awareness campaign for students, parents,
356 and the underemployed; and to implement a national recruitment campaign to
357 attract talent at all levels of experience across high-growth, high demand
358 occupations.
359 (u) ACCS Innovation Center 19,500,000 19,500,000
360 (v) LPN Programs 4,000,000 4,000,000
361 The above appropriation shall be expended to establish new and to support
362 current stand-alone LPN Programs throughout the state. The above appropriation
363 shall not be used to enter into exclusive agreements between community
364 colleges and any single healthcare entity.
365 (w) Career Tech Equipment 10,000,000 10,000,000
366 To provide new or updated equipment for career and technical education
367 programs in order to ensure that programs meet current business and industry
368 standards to provide students with the training and skills necessary to
369 provide a workforce for new, existing, or expanding jobs.
370 (x) Short Term Credential Scholarship 1,000,000 1,000,000
371 Program
372 To provide scholarships to Alabama residents enrolling in short-term
373 credential programs within the Alabama Community College System. Eligible
374 students may receive a grant of up to $4,500 to cover qualifying educational
375 expenses, including tuition, fees, books, and supplies necessary for the
376 short-term credential program.
377 (y) Alabama Career Roadmap 2,000,000 2,000,000
378 (z) Cyber Technology and AI Expansion 1,000,000 1,000,000
379 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
380 (1) ETF 658,001,653
Page 14

(1) ETF 658,001,653
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
381 (2) Federal and Other Funds 436,050,148
382 (3) ACS Truck Driver Fund 2,000,000
383 (4) Dual Enrollment Tax Credit Fund 10,000,000
384 Total Community College System Board of 658,001,653 448,050,148 1,106,051,801
385 Trustees, Alabama
386 (1) The allocations as set forth above shall be distributed by the Alabama Community
387 College System Board of Trustees through the Office of the Chancellor.
388
389 (2) The Chancellor of the Alabama Community College System shall report
390 semi-annually to the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Finance and
391 Taxation-Education, the House Ways and Means-Education Committee, the Finance
392 Director, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer any funds expended for the Alabama
393 Technology Network.
394
395 9. Cyber Technology and Engineering,
396 Alabama School of:
397 (a) Operations and Maintenance 14,658,038 914,936 15,572,974
398 (1) Accel Program 829,000
399 For statewide cyber education in K-12 schools as provided in Section 16-26D-6, Code of Alabama
400 1975.
401 (2) Alabama Cyber Range 775,000
402 For a virtual on-demand cybersecurity training platform available to K-12 schools statewide.
403 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
404 (1) ETF 14,658,038
405 (2) Federal and Local Funds 914,936
406 Total Cyber Technology and Engineering, 14,658,038 914,936 15,572,974
407 Alabama School of
408 10. Debt Service:
409 (a) Payments on Endowments 81,880 81,880
410 Payments on endowments shall be as provided below.
Page 15

Payments on endowments shall be as provided below.
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
411 (1) Auburn University Endowment, For 20,280
412 interest on
413 (2) Grove Hill Endowment, For interest on 600
414 (3) University of Alabama Endowment, For 61,000
415 interest on
416 (b) Interest on Public School Fund 532,864 532,864
417 Endowment
418 Interest on Public School Fund Endowment shall be as provided below.
419 (1) 16th Section Lands (Estimated), 410,000
420 Interest on
421 (2) James Wallace Fund, Interest on 275
422 (3) School Indemnity Lands (Estimated), 90,000
423 Interest on
424 (4) Surplus Revenue, Interest on 26,764
425 (5) Valueless 16th Section Land, Interest 5,825
426 on
427 (c) General Obligation Bonds, 27,165,423 27,165,423
428 Estimated
429 The above appropriation shall be used to pay debt service on the following
430 General Obligation Bonds: Series 2016-A, Series 2016-C, Series 2018-A, and
431 Series 2018-B. In the event any of the above bonds are refunded or new General
432 Obligation bonds are issued, debt service on these newly issued bonds may be
433 paid from the appropriations made above from the Education Trust Fund
434 contingent upon the recommendation of the Director of Finance and the approval
435 of the Governor.
436 (d) Alabama Incentives Financing 3,855,833 3,855,833
437 Authority Bonds, Estimated
Page 16

3,855,833 3,855,833
Authority Bonds, Estimated
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
438 The above appropriation shall be used to pay debt service on the following
439 Alabama Incentives Financing Authority Bonds: Series 2009-B, Series 2019-A,
440 and Series 2019-B. In the event any of the above bonds are refunded or new
441 Alabama Incentives Financing Authority bonds are issued, debt service on these
442 newly issued bonds may be paid from the appropriations made above from the
443 Education Trust Fund contingent upon the recommendation of the Director of
444 Finance and the approval of the Governor.
445 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
446 (1) ETF 31,103,136
447 (2) ETF-Transfer 532,864
448 Total Debt Service 31,636,000 31,636,000
449 11. Dental Scholarship Awards, Board
450 of:
451 (a) Support of Other Educational 871,166 2,722,000 3,593,166
452 Activities Program
453 To be expended under the provisions of Sections 16-47-76 through 16-47-81,
454 Code of Alabama 1975.
455 (1) Alabama Dental Service Program 500,000
456 As set out in Sections 16-47-77 through 16-47-81, Code of Alabama 1975.
457 (2) Alabama Rural Dental Health Scholars 140,000
458 Program
459 As set out in Section 16-47-76, Code of Alabama 1975.
460 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
461 (1) ETF 871,166
462 (2) Dental Scholarship Awards Fund 2,722,000
463 Total Dental Scholarship Awards, Board 871,166 2,722,000 3,593,166
464 of
465 12. Early Childhood Education,
466 Department of:
467 (a) Social Services Program 226,595,637 22,711,178 249,306,815
Page 17

(a) Social Services Program 226,595,637 22,711,178 249,306,815
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
468 (1) Dolly Parton Imagination Library 3,100,000
469 (2) Home Instruction for Parents of 5,000,000
470 Preschool Youngsters (HIPPY)/First
471 Teacher Home Visiting Program
472 (3) Marketing Campaign for Alabama Family 750,000
473 Central
474 (4) Office of School Readiness 209,866,459
475 (5) Operations and Maintenance 3,123,484
476 (6) Strong Start/Strong Finish 4,755,694
477 (b) Children's Policy Council Program 4,497,679 4,497,679
478 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
479 (1) ETF 226,595,637
480 (2) Federal and Local Funds 22,711,178
481 (3) Children's Policy Council Fund 4,497,679
482 Total Early Childhood Education, 226,595,637 27,208,857 253,804,494
483 Department of
484 It is the intent of the Legislature that the above appropriation for the Strong
485 Start/Strong Finish initiative be used to expand the Pre-K-3rd approach to learning
486 and will incorporate the most successful parts of Pre-K-3rd initiatives in order to
487 establish a strong foundation of early learning experiences that promotes student
488 achievement and success. It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department
489 notify the members of each local legislative delegation (whenever possible) prior to
490 grants being awarded in each legislative district. The Department shall notify the
491 legislative delegation of the amount of the grant, the recipient of the grant and
492 the date the grant is awarded.
493 13. Economic and Community Affairs,
494 Alabama Department of:
495 (a) Research and Development Grant 5,000,000 5,000,000
496 Program
497 The Department shall be eligible for an administrative fee not to exceed two
498 and one-half percent (2.5%) of the sum appropriated herein.
Page 18

and one-half percent (2.5%) of the sum appropriated herein.
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
499 (b) Rural Broadband Grant Program 5,000,000 5,000,000
500 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
501 (1) ETF-Transfer 10,000,000
502 Total Economic and Community Affairs, 10,000,000 10,000,000
503 Alabama Department of
504 14. Education, State Board of Local
505 Boards of Education:
506 (a) Foundation Program 5,001,426,709 966,148,885 5,967,575,594
507 These funds shall be allocated to each LEA with the requirement that each step
508 of each salary schedule for each class and type of employee provides an hourly
509 rate of not less than $15 per hour, based upon the number of contract days and
510 number of hours per day required by the job description for that class and
511 type of employee.
512
513 (1) Alabama Student Information Management 13,839,874
514 System
515 For the conversion and modernization of the Alabama Student Information Management System
516 (ASIMS). ASIMS will allow the continued support and maintenance of the Information Management
517 System which permits each local Education Agency and the State Department of Education to
518 comply with all state and federal accountability standards and reporting obligations. These
519 funds shall be expended for the State Department of Education's Fiscal Year 2027 costs for
520 implementation of the new ASIMS.
521 (b) Transportation Program 586,223,642 586,223,642
Page 19

(b) Transportation Program 586,223,642 586,223,642
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
522 The rate per day for two personal days and five sick days for transportation
523 personnel shall be $50. The State Department of Education shall develop a plan
524 to fund and replace school buses that have been in service for more than ten
525 years. The plan shall take into consideration the age and mileage of eligible
526 buses and the number of eligible buses that run morning and afternoon routes.
527 The Department shall provide a copy of the plan to the Chair of the House Ways
528 and Means-Education Committee, the Chair of the Senate Committee on Finance
529 and Taxation-Education, the Finance Director, and the Legislative Fiscal
530 Officer by the 5th legislative day of the 2027 Regular Session.
531 (c) Endowment Interest Program-Public 532,864 532,864
532 School Fund, Estimated
533 (d) Public School Fund, Estimated 215,000,000 215,000,000
534 Notwithstanding Section 16-13-234, Code of Alabama 1975, the local boards of
535 education shall request waivers to spend Public School Funds appropriated in
536 this Act, after the payment of pledged debt service or obligated capital
537 projects, for other operating expenses.
538 (e) Board of Adjustment 50,000 50,000
539 (f) School Nurses Program 96,448,015 96,448,015
Page 20

(f) School Nurses Program 96,448,015 96,448,015
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
540 To be distributed so that each school system shall receive one nurse and an
541 additional nurse or fractions of a nursing allocation based upon the average
542 daily membership during the first 20 scholastic days after Labor Day of the
543 preceding school year. It is the intent of the Legislature to provide funding
544 to allow each school to have a school nurse by fiscal year 2029. The School
545 Nurses Program shall use the following salary matrix to determine nursing
546 salaries, based on 187 contract days, with school nurses paid based upon their
547 years of public-school nurse experience and highest degree earned. The pay of
548 any part-time employee shall conform to the pro-rata share of the following
549 matrix:
550
551
552 STE LPN RN-ASN RN-BSN RN-MSN RN-DNP
553 P
554
555 0 34,609 45,660 49,235 53,090 57,247
556 1 34,609 45,660 49,235 53,090 57,247
557 2 34,609 45,660 49,235 53,090 57,247
558 3 38,066 50,221 54,152 58,393 62,965
559 4 38,066 50,221 54,152 58,393 62,965
560 5 38,066 50,221 54,152 58,393 62,965
Page 21

5 38,066 50,221 54,152 58,393 62,965
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
561 6 39,735 52,422 56,527 60,954 65,726
562 7 39,735 52,422 56,527 60,954 65,726
563 8 39,735 52,422 56,527 60,954 65,726
564 9 40,934 54,005 58,234 62,794 67,710
565 10 41,343 54,545 58,816 63,421 68,386
566 11 41,756 55,090 59,403 64,055 69,070
567 12 42,174 55,641 59,999 64,696 69,762
568 13 42,596 56,198 60,598 65,344 70,459
569 14 43,023 56,760 61,205 65,997 71,164
570 15 43,454 57,329 61,817 66,657 71,876
571 16 43,887 57,901 62,435 67,324 72,594
572 17 44,327 58,480 63,059 67,997 73,320
573 18 44,769 59,065 63,689 68,676 74,054
Page 22

18 44,769 59,065 63,689 68,676 74,054
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
574 19 45,217 59,655 64,326 69,363 74,794
575 20 45,668 60,252 64,968 70,056 75,542
576 21 46,126 60,855 65,619 70,758 76,298
577 22 46,587 61,463 66,274 71,464 77,059
578 23 47,053 62,078 66,938 72,179 77,831
579 24 47,523 62,699 67,608 72,902 78,610
580 25 47,999 63,325 68,283 73,630 79,395
581 26 48,478 63,958 68,966 74,366 80,189
582 27 48,964 64,598 69,657 75,110 80,992
583 28 49,453 65,244 70,353 75,861 81,800
584 29 49,948 65,897 71,056 76,620 82,619
585 30 50,447 66,555 71,766 77,385 83,445
586 31 50,952 67,221 72,484 78,159 84,279
Page 23

31 50,952 67,221 72,484 78,159 84,279
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
587 32 51,462 67,894 73,210 78,941 85,123
588 33 51,976 68,572 73,940 79,730 85,973
589 34 52,495 69,257 74,680 80,526 86,833
590 35 53,020 69,950 75,426 81,333 87,701
591
592 (g) Information Technology Services 23,779,178 23,779,178
593 Program
594 The above appropriation shall be expended by local school systems towards the
595 position of a District Technology Director that meets the job description and
596 qualifications established by Section 16-22-20, Code of Alabama 1975.
597 (1) Alabama Leaders in Educational 150,000
598 Technology (ALET)
599 The Department shall consult with the Alabama Leaders in Educational Technology (ALET) to
600 implement this allocation, and to assist school systems' effective use of these funds,
601 including but not limited to, conducting workshops, training, and collaborative support for
602 cybersecurity. The above appropriation shall be directed to Alabama Leaders in Educational
603 Technology (ALET) to assist school systems' effective use of these funds, including but not
604 limited to, conducting workshops, training, and collaborative support for cybersecurity.
605 (2) Cybersecurity Improvement 12,051,980
Page 24

(2) Cybersecurity Improvement 12,051,980
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
606 The above appropriation shall be used to improve cybersecurity, including protection of data
607 and infrastructure. The State Department of Education shall allocate this portion of the
608 appropriation with $68,000 for each local education agency, plus $2.00 per student for each
609 student over 1,000 in districts with 1,000 or more students, including the Alabama Institute
610 for Deaf and Blind, the Alabama School for Math and Science, the Alabama School of Fine Arts,
611 the Alabama School of Cyber Technology and Engineering, the Alabama School of Healthcare
612 Sciences, and the Department of Youth Services through applications submitted to the
613 Department. Allocations shall be used to fund network administration and/or technology that
614 sustains, complements, upgrades, or augments current security measures.
615 Any cybersecurity funds not awarded to school systems shall be directed to the Alabama Leaders
616 in Educational Technology to fund programs or pilots to improve the cybersecurity of Alabama's
617 K-12 public school systems.
618
619
620 (h) Career Tech Operations and 10,000,000 10,000,000
621 Maintenance
622 (i) Current Units 2,000,000 2,000,000
623 The above appropriation includes funds for start-up and/or conversion of
624 public charter schools which shall be funded at Foundation Program cost per
625 unit in the same manner as other public K-12 schools.
626 (j) Math and Science Teacher Program 72,000,000 72,000,000
Page 25

(j) Math and Science Teacher Program 72,000,000 72,000,000
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
627 To be distributed to school systems based on the provisions of Article 15
628 of Chapter 13 of Title 16 of the Code of Alabama 1975. The Math and Science
629 Teacher Program shall use the following salary matrix to determine the
630 salaries of qualified math and science teachers, based on 189 contract days.
631 In addition to the following salaries, qualified math and science teachers
632 employed in hard-to-staff schools shall receive an additional $5,000 stipend.
633
634 Step Bachelor Master AA/EDS Doctor
635
636 0 51,532 58,431 62,573 66,714
637
638 1 55,164 63,438 68,403 73,371
639
640 2 58,112 66,825 72,075 77,285
641
642 3 59,811 68,782 74,185 79,548
643
644 4 61,557 70,790 76,349 81,869
645
646 5 63,348 72,849 78,571 84,252
647
648 6 65,188 74,963 80,853 86,697
649
Page 26

80,853
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
650 7 67,075 77,135 83,193 89,208
651
652 8 68,416 78,675 84,857 90,993
653
654 9 69,784 80,250 86,554 92,813
655
656 10 70,829 81,455 87,851 94,204
657
658 11 71,892 82,677 89,170 95,616
659
660 12 72,971 83,917 90,506 97,051
661
662 13 72,971 83,917 90,506 97,051
663
664 14 72,971 83,917 90,506 97,051
665
666 15 74,069 85,181 91,871 98,513
667
668 16 74,069 85,181 91,871 98,513
669
Page 27

16
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
670 17 74,069 85,181 91,871 98,513
671
672 18 75,192 86,470 93,261 100,004
673
674 19 75,192 86,470 93,261 100,004
675
676 20 75,192 86,470 93,261 100,004
677
678 21 76,335 87,787 94,680 101,526
679
680 22 76,335 87,787 94,680 101,526
681
682 23 76,335 87,787 94,680 101,526
683
684 24 77,501 89,126 96,126 103,078
685
686 25 77,501 89,126 96,126 103,078
687
688 26 77,501 89,126 96,126 103,078
689
Page 28

26
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
690 27 78,691 90,496 97,602 104,660
691
692
693 (k) Parental Leave 12,000,000 12,000,000
694 The Alabama State Department of Education will reimburse each LEA for each day
695 of approved leave pursuant to Code of Alabama 1975, §41-22-6, based on the
696 daily substitute teacher rate specified in the annual education budget.
697 (l) RAISE Act Program 58,000,000 133,000,000 191,000,000
Page 29

(l) RAISE Act Program 58,000,000 133,000,000 191,000,000
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
698 To be distributed to school systems pursuant to Section 16-13-362, Code of
699 Alabama 1975. In fiscal year 2027, if any LEA has a poverty, English language
700 learner, or gifted student group whose calculated weighted allocation below is
701 less than the LEA’s allocation through the relevant grant programs
702 consolidated into the RAISE Fund (Local Boards At-Risk, English Learners Grant
703 Program, Gifted Students Program), then they shall receive the same amount of
704 funding as they did in fiscal year 2026. The RAISE Act Program allocations to
705 school systems for fiscal year 2027 shall be based a Base Funding Factor of
706 $7,829 per student and the following weights:
707
708
709 Student Group: Weighted Allocation:
710 Students in Poverty 2.25%
711 Special Education:
712
713 Tier 1: Specific Learning 2%
714 Disability, Speech/Language
715 Impairment, Other Health
716 Impairment
717 Tier 2: Autism Spectrum Disorder, 10%
718 Intellectual Disability,
719 Developmental Disability, Multiple
720 Disabilities
721 Tier 3: Emotional Disturbance or 75%
722 Disability, Hearing Impairment,
Page 30

75%
Disability, Hearing Impairment,
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
723 Orthopedic Impairment, Visual
724 Impairment, Deaf-Blindness,
725 Traumatic Brain Injury
726 English Language Learners 7% with 10% for concentrated (over
727 9% ADM)
728 Gifted Students 4.5% (5% ADM)
729 Charter School Students attending 2%
730 an eligible charter school
731 physically located in school
732 system with a B, C, D, or F grade
733 on the latest Alabama Education
734 Report Card pursuant to Chapter
735 6C, Title 16, Code of Alabama
736 1975
737
738
739 (m) Special Education Teacher Stipend 7,904,000 7,904,000
740 The above appropriation includes funds to pay salary supplements of $1,200 and
741 related benefit costs for each classroom Special Education Teacher, including
742 the Alabama Institute for Deaf and Blind and the Youth Services School
743 District.
744 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
745 (1) ETF 5,739,831,544
746 (2) ETF-Transfer 130,000,000
747 (3) Federal and Local Funds 966,148,885
748 (4) Public School Fund, Estimated 215,532,864
749 (5) RAISE Fund 133,000,000
Page 31

(5) RAISE Fund 133,000,000
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
750 Total Education, State Board of Local 5,869,831,544 1,314,681,749 7,184,513,293
751 Boards of Education
Page 32

5,869,831,544 1,314,681,749 7,184,513,293
Boards of Education
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
752 Upon certification and approval by the Deputy State Superintendent of the Office of
753 Administrative and Financial Services that any newly formed city school system is an
754 operational public school system within the State of Alabama, the Department shall
755 ensure that any Foundation Program funds or other state funds allocated to the
756 parent county board of education of the newly formed city school system for students
757 that attended and were counted in the Average Daily Membership of the parent county
758 board of education and now will attend the newly formed city school system shall be
759 transferred to the newly formed city school system for operational expenses. The
760 above appropriation shall be distributed by the State Board of Education in
761 accordance with the provisions of Sections 16-13-230 through 16-13-239, Code of
762 Alabama 1975, and all other laws and regulations of the State Board of Education
763 relating to the expenditure of such funds. These funds shall be used to provide a
764 minimum school term of 180 full instructional days, or the hourly equivalent
765 thereof, and for equitable educational opportunities in the public schools of the
766 State. It is the intent of the Legislature that local boards of education allocate
767 state and federal funding to conversion charter schools as required by law. It is
768 further the intent of the Legislature that funds appropriated from the Education
769 Trust Fund shall not be used to pay membership dues to any organization/association.
770 Foundation Program calculations for fiscal year 2026-2027 are based on the funding
771 divisors set forth below. Units earned under the Foundation Program shall be
772 employed as regular classroom teachers and assigned by the local board of education.
773 The divisors listed below shall not serve to prescribe pupil-teacher ratios. It is
774 the intent of the Legislature that local boards of education have flexibility in
775 determining where reductions are made. Any reductions made using flexibility of
776 state units must comply with federal comparability and supplanting guidelines. Each
777 district will submit an application for approval by the State Superintendent as to
778 the unit allocation adjustments requested.
779
780 Grades K-3: 14.25
781 Grades 4-6: 20.06
782 Grades 7-8: 19.70
783 Grades 9-12: 17.95
Page 33

Grades 9-12: 17.95
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
784
785 In allocating the funds in the Foundation Program, the State Board of Education
786 shall allot funds based on the rates established as follows:
787 The Foundation Program shall use the following salary matrix to determine the cost
788 of instructional salaries, based on 187 contract days, and any part-time contract
789 shall conform to the pro-rata share of the following matrix:
790
791 Years BS MS 6Y DO ND
792 Experience
793
794
795 0 48,552 52,913 57,055 61,195 48,552
796
797 1 48,552 52,913 57,055 61,195 48,552
798
799 2 48,552 52,913 57,055 61,195 48,552
800
801 3 50,609 58,200 62,755 67,317 50,609
802
803 4 50,609 58,200 62,755 67,317 50,609
804
805 5 50,609 58,200 62,755 67,317 50,609
806
Page 34

SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
807 6 52,828 60,750 65,522 70,259 52,828
808
809 7 52,828 60,750 65,522 70,259 52,828
810
811 8 52,828 60,750 65,522 70,259 52,828
812
813 9 54,424 62,586 67,501 72,382 54,424
814
815 10 54,966 63,211 68,175 73,105 54,966
816
817 11 55,517 63,843 68,857 73,835 55,517
818
819 12 56,072 64,482 69,545 74,574 56,072
820
821 13 56,633 65,125 70,242 75,319 56,633
822
823 14 57,199 65,777 70,943 76,073 57,199
824
825 15 57,771 66,436 71,653 76,834 57,771
826
Page 35

15
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
827 16 58,349 67,099 72,369 77,602 58,349
828
829 17 58,932 67,770 73,094 78,378 58,932
830
831 18 59,522 68,448 73,825 79,161 59,522
832
833 19 60,116 69,132 74,564 79,952 60,116
834
835 20 60,718 69,824 75,308 80,753 60,718
836
837 21 61,325 70,522 76,062 81,561 61,325
838
839 22 61,938 71,228 76,821 82,376 61,938
840
841 23 62,557 71,939 77,590 83,199 62,557
842
843 24 63,183 72,659 78,366 84,031 63,183
844
845 25 63,815 73,385 79,149 84,872 63,815
846
Page 36

25
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
847 26 64,452 74,119 79,941 85,720 64,452
848
849 27 65,098 74,860 80,741 86,578 65,098
850
851 28 65,749 75,609 81,547 87,443 65,749
852
853 29 66,407 76,365 82,363 88,318 66,407
854
855 30 67,070 77,129 83,187 89,202 67,070
856
857 31 67,741 77,900 84,019 90,092 67,741
858
859 32 68,419 78,679 84,859 90,994 68,419
860
861 33 69,102 79,466 85,708 91,905 69,102
862
863 34 69,793 80,260 86,565 92,824 69,793
864
865 35 70,492 81,063 87,430 93,751 70,492
866
867 Professional learning activities are sustained, intensive, collaborative,
Page 37

Professional learning activities are sustained, intensive, collaborative,
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
868 job-embedded, data-driven, and classroom-focused to provide educators with the
869 knowledge and skills necessary to enable students to succeed and meet the
870 challenging state academic standards. At least fifty percent of all professional
871 learning requirements necessary to retain a valid Alabama teaching certificate shall
872 be directly related to the knowledge and skills necessary to provide high quality
873 instruction that leads to student development and academic growth. The State Board
874 of Education may adopt rules, as necessary, for initial or recertification criteria.
875 The State Superintendent shall provide a status report on the approval system status
876 and budgetary needs to the Chairs of the House Ways and Means-Education and Senate
877 Finance and Taxation-Education Committees on a semi-annual basis.
878
879 Notwithstanding Section 16-13-231.1(d), Code of Alabama 1975, there shall not be an
880 appropriation for the 1% over the total cost of instructional salaries for the
881 Foundation Program as calculated by the State Minimum Salary Schedule for the fiscal
882 year beginning October 1, 2026. For "Fringe Benefits" the rate per day for two
883 personal days and five sick days (for units earned in the Foundation Program) shall
884 be $120. The Teachers' Retirement System employer rate shall be 14.66% of salaries
885 for Tier I members and 13.70% of salaries for Tier II members. The Public Education
886 Employees' Health Insurance Program (PEEHIP) rate shall be $1,073 per month for each
887 full-time employee. As funds are appropriated, the appropriation herein shall
888 include funds to pay for substitute support employees for each day a support
889 employee is absent.
890
891 For "Classroom Instructional Support," the uniform amounts used in determining the
892 Foundation Program allowance for classroom instructional support shall be: (1)
893 textbooks or digital resources at $100.00 per pupil in average daily membership
894 during the first 20 scholastic days after Labor Day of the preceding school year;
895 (2) classroom materials and supplies at $1,000.00 per unit earned in the Foundation
896 Program; (3) technology at $500.00 per unit earned in the Foundation Program; (4)
897 professional development at $100.00 per unit earned in the Foundation Program; and
898 (5) library enhancement at $157.72 per unit earned in the Foundation Program. 100%
899 of funds allocated for classroom materials and supplies shall be used for
Page 38

of funds allocated for classroom materials and supplies shall be used for
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
900 in-classroom expenses. Funds for classroom materials and supplies shall not be used
901 to maintain, repair, or replace technology equipment or devices, or other
902 instructional material that is mandated by the State Department of Education, and is
903 used in the classroom to provide instruction to students. Funds allocated for
904 instructional support units to meet Advanced Education standards may be used for
905 principals, assistant principals, counselors, and librarians as calculated by the
906 State Department of Education and assigned to the schools where such units are
907 earned. An instructional support unit earned for a principal shall be increased by
908 .31 for elementary schools, .35 for middle schools, and .45 for secondary schools
909 and unit schools. For assistant principals, an instructional support unit earned
910 shall be 0.5 FTE for elementary schools with an ADM of 300-499.99 and 1.0 FTE for
911 middle schools with an ADM of 300-499.99. An instructional support unit earned for a
912 counselor shall be increased by .03 for secondary schools and unit schools. The
913 budgeting and expenditure of funds in the Foundation Program at the local level
914 shall be determined and made by the local board of education in accordance with
915 rules and regulations of the State Board of Education and all laws governing such
916 school budgets and expenditures.
917
918 15. Education, State Department of:
919 (a) Administrative Services Program 571,954,152 65,550,183 637,504,335
920 (1) Advancement Placement 13,500,000
921 The above appropriation may support the programmatic work of A+ Education Partnership to expand
922 access to Advanced Placement (AP) courses and rigorous curricula in preceding grades by
923 providing educator training, equipment, incentives, and ongoing support to teachers and
924 students. Subject to appropriations, it is the intent of the Legislature that the State
925 Department of Education may also provide funds to pay for the AP exam fees for Alabama students
926 eligible to receive free or reduced lunch.
927 (2) Alabama Holocaust Commission 150,000
928 (3) Alabama Math, Science and Technology 159,128,318
929 Initiative - Operations and Maintenance
Page 39

159,128,318
Initiative - Operations and Maintenance
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
930 From the above appropriation, the State Superintendent of Education shall direct Alabama Math,
931 Science and Technology Initiative Program (AMSTI) resources to the districts based on their
932 individual needs. This appropriation shall not be transferred and must be expended in
933 accordance with the intent of the appropriation to each of the AMSTI sites. It is the intent of
934 the Legislature that funds appropriated for AMSTI be divided based upon the number of classroom
935 teachers served by in-service centers and expended only for AMSTI through established
936 procedures of the most recent year's contractual agreement of each site within the regional
937 in-service center regions. The State Superintendent of Education shall report semi-annually to
938 the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Finance and Taxation-Education, the House Ways and
939 Means-Education Committee, the Permanent Joint Legislative Committee on Finances and Budgets,
940 the Finance Director, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer the expenditures for AMSTI. Such
941 report shall include, but not be limited to, the amounts expended for the equipment, materials
942 and supplies needed to teach math and science, as well as the amounts expended for professional
943 development and on-site support. The report shall also include information regarding the
944 effectiveness of the initiative in improving math and science test scores for K-12 students. No
945 money appropriated for the Alabama Reading Initiative or AMSTI may be repurposed by the State
946 Superintendent of Education for any other purpose other than those already established herein.
947 a. Alabama Numeracy Act 114,000,000
948 To be expended in accordance with Title 16, Chapter 6H, Code of Alabama 1975. An education task
949 force that is responsible for vendor evaluations for the Numeracy Act shall provide all notes,
950 scoring sheets, and rubrics to the Department of Education and the Department shall make this
951 information available to vendors upon request post-award.
952 b. Data Literacy 2,629,000
953 The above appropriation shall be expended in collaboration with Quant Hub.
954 c. Saban Center 2,000,000
955 It is the intent of the Legislature that funds be utilized for teacher training, professional
956 development, and teacher internships at the Saban Center as agreed to by the State Department
957 of Education, in support of mathematics and science goals established by the Department.
958 Teachers should be selected from a variety of schools, with a strategic emphasis to include
959 those in the Black Belt Region and/or with a large percentage of economically disadvantaged
960 students.
961 d. Early Childhood Classroom Assessment 1,700,000
Page 40

d. Early Childhood Classroom Assessment 1,700,000
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
962 (4) Alabama Reading Initiative - Operations 151,950,000
963 and Maintenance
964 It is the intent of the Legislature that funds appropriated for the Alabama Reading Initiative
965 be expended only for the Alabama Reading Initiative Program. The State Superintendent of
966 Education shall report semi-annually to the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Finance and
967 Taxation-Education, the House Ways and Means-Education Committee, the Permanent Joint
968 Legislative Committee on Finances and Budgets, the Finance Director, and the Legislative Fiscal
969 Officer, the expenditures for the Alabama Reading Initiative Program. Such report shall
970 include, but not be limited to, the specific amounts expended for professional development, a
971 summary and evaluation of summer and afterschool programming across the state, and on-site
972 support for school coaches and support staff for Alabama Reading Initiative purposes only. The
973 remaining funds shall be expended for any of the following: for the employment of state and
974 regional level reading specialists, for professional development and technical assistance to
975 schools, to supplement the costs of local reading coaches, summer enrichment programs,
976 incentives for schools demonstrating the most growth in grade 3 reading achievement, or other
977 purposes to improve K-3 literacy. The remaining funds appropriated herein shall be expended in
978 accordance with the general provisions of the Alabama Literacy Act, Chapter 6G of Title 16. The
979 State Superintendent of Education shall ensure these funds target the lowest performing
980 schools. An education task force that is responsible for vendor evaluations for the Alabama
981 Literacy Act shall provide all notes, scoring sheets, and rubrics to the Department of
982 Education and the Department shall make this information available to vendors upon request
983 post-award.
984 a. K-3 Reading Coaches 36,800,000
985 A minimum of the amount above shall be allocated directly to local boards of education for the
986 employment of reading coaches to work in grades K-3. At a minimum, $80,000 shall be distributed
987 to each local board of education for the employment of a full time reading coach. The remaining
988 funds shall be distributed to each local board of education pro-rata based on the number of K-3
989 schools and/or students as determined by the State Department of Education. All funds are to be
990
distributed and expended for reading coaches to serve grades K, 1, 2, and 3 only.
991
b. Certified Academic Language Therapist 600,000
992
(CALT) Stipend Program
Page 41

600,000
(CALT) Stipend Program
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
993 The above appropriation includes funds to pay salary supplements and related benefit costs for
994 Certified Academic Language Therapists (CALT) and other costs of the program. Supplement
995 amounts will be determined by the availability of funds based on the number of CALT
996 Teachers. The state of Alabama will provide an annual supplement of $5,000 to any CALT that is
997 employed full-time in a public K-12 school system or public independent school and is properly
998 certified by the state of Alabama. The existing eligibility criteria will apply: (a) CALTs
999 employed on less than a full-time contract on October 1 will receive a pro-rata share of the
1000 salary supplement. (b) CALTs employed full-time after October 1 will receive a pro-rata share
1001 of the salary supplement. (c) Any CALT employed full-time in Alabama and properly certified by
1002 the state of Alabama will receive the annual salary stipend. (d) CALTs employed as a substitute
1003 are not eligible for the salary supplement. (e) CALTs who are on leave of absence for more than
1004 half a school year will receive a prorated amount based on the number of months worked during
1005 the school year. (f) CALTs will receive the salary supplement each year of the valid period of
1006 the CALT credentials unless the Alabama Legislature declines to make the annual appropriation.
1007 (g) CALTs must maintain their CALT credentials in order to continue receiving the salary
1008 supplement. (h) CALTs employed in the final year of their CALT credentials valid period will
1009 receive a prorated amount based on the number of months worked covered in that valid period.
1010 (i) CALTs who leave after October 1 will be eligible for a prorated amount based on the months
1011 served. (j) CALTs must remain employed with a public K-12 Local Board of Education school
1012 system or public independent school to continue receiving the salary supplement.
1013 c. Early Childhood Classroom Assessment 1,700,000
1014 (5) Alabama Summer and Afterschool Program 17,286,000
Page 42

(5) Alabama Summer and Afterschool Program 17,286,000
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1015 Of the above appropriation, $17,200,000 shall be expended for the Alabama Summer and
1016 Afterschool Program (ASAP) grants program with the objective of reducing the achievement gap in
1017 students who are not proficient in reading and/or math.
1018 The State Superintendent of Education shall administer the grants process. Grants shall be
1019 awarded to a) local education agencies, municipalities, and not-for-profit organizations for
1020 summer and afterschool programs that provide direct services and b) to entities that provide
1021 support to summer and after-school programs. Afterschool programs shall be guided by the
1022 Alabama Afterschool Quality Standards; summer programs shall be guided by the "Final Report and
1023 Recommendations" of the Alabama Campaign for Grade-Level Reading, Pages 81-92.
1024 Data on student and program outcomes shall be collected and used to inform a continuous
1025 improvement process. A report shall be provided to the Legislature listing grantees and
1026 summarizing outcomes.
1027 The intent of the Legislature is to increase access to evidence-based, high-quality summer and
1028 afterschool programming, to build a diverse delivery model of providers, and to foster
1029 collaboration between local education agencies and community-based organizations. The goal is
1030 to award at least 60% of the funding to nonprofit, community based organizations or
1031 partnerships between community-based organizations and local education agencies.
1032
1033
1034 (6) Arts Education 2,000,000
1035 (7) Better Basics 500,000
1036 For reading and math instruction and resources to the educationally vulnerable.
1037 (8) Children First Trust Fund 3,050,000
1038 The above appropriation will be directed by the State Department of Education towards the
1039 specialized treatment of students with autism, students with emotional disabilities and
1040 students with deficit disorders. The Department may also allocate funds to each local
1041 educational agency as a supplemental appropriation based upon the number of students with
1042 identifiable disabilities.
1043 (9) Children's Eye Screening Program and 2,896,460
1044 Follow-up Eye Care
Page 43

2,896,460
Follow-up Eye Care
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1045 Vendors shall file a report on or before December 31, 2026 with the Chairs of the House Ways
1046 and Means-Education Committee, the Senate Committee on Finance and Taxation-Education, the
1047 Finance Director, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer. Children identified as uninsured or
1048 underinsured shall be provided with free eye exams and free prescription spectacles. A database
1049 including specific data by child, grade, school/system, and services for outcome-based
1050 measurement shall be maintained and archived.
1051 a. Student Eye Screenings 1,448,230
1052 To provide eye screening for students in Grades K, 2 and 4. The method of screening shall be
1053 color photo refraction as developed by the National Aeronautics and Space Administration.
1054 b. Student Follow-Up Eye care 1,448,230
1055 To provide follow-up eye care for Grades K, 2 and 4 students. Follow-up eye care services shall
1056 include, but not be limited to, providing assistance in obtaining and coordinating local eye
1057 care services for those children identified as needing said follow-up eye care services whether
1058 insured, uninsured or underinsured.
1059 (10) Computer Science for Alabama (CS4AL) 7,000,000
1060 Program
1061 (11) Distance Learning 26,000,000
1062 Includes testing. Job descriptions shall be developed by the State Department of Education for
1063 positions funded by this appropriation. The hiring of personnel shall be monitored by the State
1064 Department of Education for compliance with these job descriptions. In addition, these funds
1065 shall be used exclusively for the distance learning initiative ACCESS (Alabama Connecting
1066 Classrooms, Educators, and Students Statewide). For the 2026-2027 school year, the Department
1067 shall not charge any Alabama resident, whether home-schooled or enrolled in a non-public
1068 school, a fee to participate in the ACCESS Program.
1069 (12) English Language Learners Program 4,000,000
1070 a. Regional EL Specialists 4,000,000
1071 Regional EL Specialists under the State Department of Education and auxiliary support.
1072 (13) High Needs Special Education Grant 14,000,000
1073 Program
1074 To provide grants to school districts for services for students or groups of students for
1075 special education and related services that are unduly expensive, extraordinary and/or beyond
1076 routine.
Page 44

routine.
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1077 (14) Juvenile Probation Officers 750,000
1078 (15) Local School and School System Academic 5,558,367
1079 and Financial Improvement Program
1080 (At-Risk)
1081 a. Legislative School Performance 250,000
1082 Recognition Program
1083 For financial awards pursuant to the Legislative School Performance Recognition Program, as
1084 established by Section 16-6C-3, Code of Alabama 1975.
1085 b. Feminine Hygiene Products Grant Program 400,000
1086 For Title I schools pursuant to Section 16-1-55, Code of Alabama 1975.
1087 c. Jones Valley Teaching Farm 700,000
1088 d. Retired Senior Volunteer Program 175,000
1089 To be used for student tutoring and mentoring. The funds allocated to the Retired Senior
1090 Volunteer Program shall not be used for salaries. The program shall file a report on October 1,
1091 2026, with the Department of Education, the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Finance and
1092 Taxation-Education, the House Ways and Means-Education Committee, the Finance Director, and the
1093 Legislative Fiscal Officer regarding the number of volunteer hours provided statewide and to
1094 each local school system for the prior year.
1095 e. Montgomery Pilot Program: Career Direct 200,000
1096 Certification
1097 To provide college credit and job training for high school students.
1098 f. Montgomery Pilot Program: Conflict 200,000
1099 Resolution
1100 For communication skill workshops, peer support groups, and a focus on parent engagement to
1101 prevent youth violence.
1102 g. Birmingham/Jefferson County Pilot 200,000
1103 Program: Conflict Resolution
1104 To be administered by the Jefferson County superintendent for communication skill workshops,
1105 peer support groups, and a focus on parent engagement to prevent youth violence.
1106 (16) Military Children Support Plan 800,000
1107 (17) Online High-Speed Teacher Certification 450,000
1108 Portal
Page 45

450,000
Portal
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1109 To support improvements in teacher certification.
1110 (18) Operations and Maintenance of the 38,999,215
1111 Department
1112 a. Unmet Needs Grant Program 10,000,000
1113 To be expended for a grant program to be administered by the State Superintendent of Education
1114 to address unmet capital, equipment, or other needs of K-12 schools. The Superintendent shall
1115 notify all members of the local legislative delegation five days prior to the announcement of
1116 any grant made to any K-12 school located in the legislative jurisdiction. The five days prior
1117 notice requirement shall be waived in the event of a declared emergency. The State
1118 Superintendent of Education shall report all grants awarded to the Chairs of the Senate
1119 Committee on Finance and Taxation-Education, the House Ways and Means-Education Committee, the
1120 Finance Director, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer. Such report shall include amounts awarded
1121 and intended use of funds.
1122 (19) School Safety Security and Climate 16,200,000
1123 Program
1124 a. Bullying Prevention Project 5,000,000
Page 46

a. Bullying Prevention Project 5,000,000
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1125 To be expended for the Bullying Prevention Project in accordance with Title 16, Chapter 28B,
1126 Code of Alabama 1975. The State Superintendent of Education shall distribute the above
1127 appropriation as grants to local education agencies. These agencies may be awarded funds only
1128 after application to the State Department of Education. The grant application process may
1129 require the submission of plans by the applicant to meet the requirements set forth in Chapter
1130 28B of Title 16. In the awarding of grants, preference will be given to applicants seeking to
1131 develop and implement evidence-based practices to promote a school environment that is free of
1132 harassment, intimidation, violence, and threats of violence. This program may also address tier
1133 one and tier two of the school-based mental health model of all students receiving prevention
1134 education and peers working to support and identify at-risk students. Additionally, the program
1135 may focus to increase school safety through early identification of at-risk students,
1136 minimizing disciplinary infractions including school suspensions and expulsions. The program
1137 may provide grade level prevention curriculum for all students and, in that case, the
1138 curriculum must be updated annually to remain current and relevant to current trends that youth
1139 face in their lives. Any applicable prevention curriculum must be comprehensive and satisfy the
1140 following state mandates: Erin's Law, Jamari Terrell Williams Student Bullying Prevention Act,
1141 Jason Flatt Act, Price Hornsby Act, and Drugs and Alcohol. In addition, any program related to
1142 mental health should be flexible enough to focus on the greatest mental health needs for each
1143 individual school. For accountability purposes, reporting data must include the number of
1144 students engaged in the programs, the number of students supported, and the number of students
1145 referred to adults as at-risk.
1146 b. Mental Health Collaborative 250,000
1147 c. Regional Safety Training Specialists 800,000
1148 d. School-Based Mental Health Service 7,650,000
1149 Coordinator
Page 47

7,650,000
Coordinator
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1150 The above appropriation shall be expended to provide grants to local education agencies and
1151 public independent schools to expand school-based mental health initiatives. The State
1152 Superintendent of Education shall notify, in writing, all school systems of the availability of
1153 the funding. The notification shall include the grant application and the amount available to
1154 each system. The grant application process must require the submission of plans by the
1155 applicant to provide for a mental health service coordinator to support coordination of mental
1156 health services throughout the system. In the awarding of grants, preference will be given to
1157 applicants willing to partner with the Alabama Department of Mental Health under the ADMH
1158 school-based Mental Health collaboration and traditionally high-poverty underserved districts
1159 throughout the state. After funding reaches $40,000 for each system, additional funding for the
1160 program shall be allocated to school systems by the Alabama State Department of Education.
1161 (20) Special Education Licensed Interpreters 8,500,000
1162 Deaf/Hard of Hearing Teachers
1163 (21) Statewide Student Assessment 20,405,117
1164 To be expended for expenses directly related to student assessments. Funds from this
1165 appropriation shall be expended to administer all requirements of Section 16-46A-10, Code of
1166 Alabama, 1975.
1167 (22) STEM Education Consortium 1,500,000
1168 To be divided equally between the Cook Natural Science Museum, The McWane Center, and the Saban
1169 Center. Funds may be used to hire personnel with a course of study focused on STEM education,
1170 and for other necessary expenses.
1171 (23) Tenure Personnel Hearings 200,000
1172 To provide reimbursements for court reporters and hearing officers under the provisions of
1173 Title 16, Chapter 24C, Code of Alabama 1975.
1174 (24) Turnaround Schools 10,000,000
Page 48

(24) Turnaround Schools 10,000,000
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1175 This appropriation shall be used for the State Department of Education, in consultation with
1176 the Department of Early Childhood Education, to fund a program to be known as the Governor's
1177 Turnaround Schools. These grants are for the lowest performing public elementary schools which
1178 are identified as underperforming by the State Superintendent in consideration of the
1179 provisions of the Alabama Accountability Act, the State Report Card System, and other criteria
1180 as determined by the State Superintendent. The intent of these grants is to identify and target
1181 specific deficiencies of each individual underperforming elementary school and target said
1182 deficiencies with high quality and innovative educational supports. In consultation with these
1183 schools as well as the local education agencies that respectively oversee these schools, the
1184 State Department of Education will develop and oversee a comprehensive plan for school
1185 improvement. It is the intention of this provision that all areas of the State Department,
1186 including Alabama Reading Initiative, Alabama Math, Science, and Technology Initiative, Office
1187 of Mathematics Improvement, and Office of School Improvement, will work together to best serve
1188 these selected schools. Schools previously named to this list will be known as Cohort 1.
1189 Beginning with the fiscal year 2027 Budget Request, the State Department will recommend a
1190 pathway for schools in Cohort 1 to exit this program, and the Department will recommend new
1191 schools to replace those exiting the program in subsequent years. These schools may be known as
1192 Cohort 2 and so forth. The State Superintendent may also request additional funds so that
1193 additional cohorts can be expanded as Cohort 1 schools leave the program over the next few
1194 years. Any expansion of new Cohorts should be modest with respect to the purpose of this
1195 program which is expected to offer extraordinary supports to a relatively limited number of
1196 schools at a time. The State Department of Education should annually produce written progress
1197 reports on these schools to the Chair of the House Ways and Means - Education Committee, the
1198
Chair of the Senate Finance and Taxation - Education Committee, the Governor, and the Local
1199
School Board, Superintendent, and Principal of each school.
1200
(25) Woolley Institute for Spoken Language 1,000,000
1201
Education
1202
(26) Office of School Improvement 2,200,560
1203
(27) Office of Specialized Treatment Centers 27,800,000
1204
Of the above appropriation, $27,000,000 shall be made available to the State Department of
1205
Education endorsed and approved Specialized Treatment Centers for the purpose of educational
1206
services and operational costs. The funds shall be allocated based on a formula using student
1207
counts and licensed capacity approved by the State Superintendent of Education.
Page 49

counts and licensed capacity approved by the State Superintendent of Education.
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1208 (28) Cameras in the Classroom Grant Program 500,000
1209 To be expended in accordance with Section 16-39-13, Code of Alabama 1975 to promote classroom
1210 and student safety in self-contained classrooms providing special education services. The above
1211 appropriation shall be expended to provide grants to public K-12 schools to use toward the
1212 purchase, installation, maintenance, and monitoring of video cameras in the classrooms.
1213 Priority shall be given first to schools with financial challenges and/or with high percentages
1214 of nonverbal children. The State Department of Education shall notify in writing all local
1215 boards of education, by July 1, 2026, of the availability of funds. The notification shall
1216 include the grant application process and the criterion used to determine the grant amounts
1217 awarded. No funding will be available until October 1, 2026.
1218 (29) Principal Leadership and Mentoring Act 33,205,115
1219 To be expended in accordance with Title 16, Chapter 6I, Code of Alabama 1975. Eligible personel
1220 at the the Department of Youth Services and Career Tech shall be allowed to participate in the
1221 program.
1222 (30) Speech Pathologist Stipend Program 775,000
1223 The above appropriation includes funds to pay salary supplements and related benefit costs for
1224 Speech Pathologists and other costs of the program. Supplement amounts will be $1,000 for each
1225 Speech Pathologist, including the Alabama Institute for the Deaf and Blind and Department of
1226 Youth Services School District.
1227 (31) Alabama Teacher Observation Tool 1,000,000
1228 To offer training and support for impactful classroom observations, providing prescriptive
1229 professional learning, guidance for elevating accomplished teaching, and improving student
1230 outcomes; and to maintain an electronic reporting system for all LEAs to utilize in this work.
1231 (32) Montgomery Pre-K Pilot Program 400,000
1232 For Pre-K programs.
1233 (33) CPR Kits 250,000
1234 $250,000 to assist LEAs with the purchase of hands-on CPR kits to be utilized in the classroom
1235 to support the hands-on practicing requirement and cognitive learning pursuant to Section
1236 16-40-8, Code of Alabama 1975.
1237 (b) American Village 2,270,000 2,270,000
1238 (1) U.S. History Commission 200,000
1239 (2) Civics Partnership 750,000
Page 50

(2) Civics Partnership 750,000
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1240 In collaboration with Troy University.
1241 (3) U.S. Constitution Program 200,000
1242 To develop and implement a new high school-level program or curriculum focused on the United
1243 States Constitution, aligned to the Alabama Course of Study: Social Studies, 2024.
1244 (c) Alabama Science in Motion Program 2,583,796 2,583,796
1245 All funds appropriated to this program shall be expended in accordance with
1246 Title 16, Chapters 61B and 61C, Code of Alabama 1975. Additionally, any funds
1247 unexpended and carried over from prior fiscal years are hereby reappropriated.
1248 Of the above appropriation, the State Superintendent of Education shall direct
1249 ASIMS funding to each site within the In-service Center regions based on the
1250 most recent year's contractual agreements. This appropriation shall not be
1251 transferred and must be expended in accordance with the intent of the
1252 appropriation of each of the ASIMS sites. The State Superintendent of
1253 Education shall report semi-annually to the Chairs of the Senate Committee on
1254 Finance and Taxation-Education, the House Ways and Means-Education Committee,
1255 the Permanent Joint Legislative Committee on Finance and Budgets, the Finance
1256 Director, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer the expenditures for the Alabama
1257 Science in Motion Program. Such report shall include, but not be limited to,
1258 the amounts expended for the equipment, materials, and supplies needed to
1259 teach Biology, Chemistry and Physics, as well as the amounts expended for
1260 professional development and for on-site support. The existing Alabama Science
1261 in Motion Advisory Committee shall advise the State Superintendent of
1262 Education on the operational activities of the ASIMS Program. The ASIMS
1263 Advisory Committee shall remain comprised of six project directors, three
1264 ASIMS Specialists and three classroom teachers; provided, however, that each
1265 of the sites shall be represented by at least one member of the ASIMS Advisory
1266 Committee. No funds appropriated for the Alabama Science in Motion Program may
1267 be repurposed by the State Superintendent of Education for any other purpose
1268 other than those already established herein.
1269 (d) Disability Determination for 107,902,162 107,902,162
1270 Social Security Program
1271 (e) Financial Assistance Program 159,408,164 2,185,993,612 2,345,401,776
Page 51

(e) Financial Assistance Program 159,408,164 2,185,993,612 2,345,401,776
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1272 (1) Alabama Baseball Coaches Association 125,000
1273 No scholarship awarded by the association shall be awarded to a recipient that is an immediate
1274 family member of a current baseball coach.
1275 (2) Alabama Coaches Officials Organization 50,000
1276 (3) Alabama Football Coaches Association 150,000
1277 No scholarship awarded by the association shall be awarded to a recipient that is an immediate
1278 family member of a current football coach.
1279 (4) Alabama Multi-Tier System of Supports 2,000,000
1280 To support the Alabama-developed, state-level Multi-tiered System of Support (AL-MTSS)
1281 Framework, as required by the Alabama Literacy Act and the Alabama Numeracy Act. This
1282 comprehensive support addresses both academic and non-academic student indicators, including
1283 those reported on the State Report Card (A-F Grading System), to drive meaningful, lasting
1284 improvement.
1285 (5) Alabama Scholars Bowl TV Show 100,000
1286 (6) Alabama Teacher Mentor Program 5,000,000
1287 In each school where there is at least one or more first-year teachers, a mentor teacher shall
1288 be identified and recommended by the school principal to the Department of Education based on
1289 (1) his or her commitment to collaborative work and (2) he or she having at least five years of
1290 teaching experience. The mentor teacher shall be compensated in an amount of no less than one
1291 thousand dollars ($1,000) for the academic year for his or her services as a mentor. The
1292 Department shall clearly define roles and responsibilities for the mentor teacher to, at a
1293 minimum, include (1) requiring at least two meetings per month of the mentor teacher and the
1294 first-year teacher during the school year, and (2) requiring mid-year and year-end reporting by
1295 the mentor teacher to his or her principal relating to the progress of each first-year teacher
1296 he or she is mentoring.
1297 (7) Career Tech Initiative 38,747,239
1298 The above appropriation shall be spent on expanding career tech learning opportunities for
1299 students and to extend leadership and student organized activities throughout the state as
1300 defined by the State Superintendent of Education.
1301 a. Agribusiness Education Program 726,900
1302 $275,000 of the amount above shall be expended for student membership dues for Future Farmers
1303 of America.
Page 52

of America.
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1304 b. Alabama Cattleman's Youth Program 80,000
1305 For an educational event where youth from all across Alabama can learn about beef nutrition and
1306 sustainable livestock production and can compete in educational contests and exhibit cattle.
1307 c. Agriscience Teachers 1,000,000
1308 Not more than $1,000,000 of the appropriation for Career Tech Initiatives shall be first used
1309 for agriscience purposes if an adequate number of RFP's are received. Such funds shall be made
1310 available through a competitive grant process to pay stipends, salaries, benefits and travel of
1311 agriscience teachers who work on a 220 day or less contract provided their duties and
1312 activities exceed existing contract length. In the event all the agriscience funds are not
1313 applied for, the balance of the $1,000,000 shall revert to the balance of the appropriation and
1314 shall be distributed at the discretion of the State Superintendent of Education for additional
1315 career tech initiatives not limited to but including travel and student leadership development
1316 activities in other career tech program disciplines.
1317 d. Career Coaches Program 15,723,370
1318 To expand the Career Coaches Program. Career coaches who are certified as teachers may be
1319 compensated on the state minimum salary schedule for teachers based upon years of experience,
1320 highest degree earned, and the length of contract in the same manner as classroom teachers.
1321 e. Imagine Academy 794,372
1322 f. ProStart Career and Technical Education 365,000
1323 Program
1324 (8) Children's Hospital 1,390,000
1325 a. Poison Control 800,000
1326 b. Sunshine School 250,000
1327 (9) Coach Safely Initiative 800,000
1328 (10) Grow your Own 569,750
1329 To provide matching funds for scholarships to students from rural high schools, designated as
1330 either Rural-Distant or Rural-Remote by the NCES, who qualify for full Pell Grant eligibility
1331 plus the TEACH Grant to attend and graduate from a 4-year in-state college or university
1332 Teacher Education Preparation Program who will then return to their home community to teach for
1333 a minimum of 5 years.
1334 (11) Helping Families Initiative 3,300,000
Page 53

(11) Helping Families Initiative 3,300,000
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1335 Not more than 15% of the appropriation shall be used for indirect, overhead, administration,
1336 training, or support expenses. The Helping Families Initiative shall file a report no later
1337 than September 30, 2027 with the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Finance and
1338 Taxation-Education, the House Ways and Means-Education Committee, the Legislative Fiscal
1339 Officer, and the Finance Director regarding the number of students served by each LEA. The
1340 report shall include measures and be in a format as prescribed by the Legislative Services
1341 Agency.
1342 (12) Healthy Eating, Active Living (HEAL, 980,000
1343 Inc.)
1344 (13) High Hopes for Alabama Students 11,980,287
1345 (14) Hudson Alpha Institute - Science 2,000,000
1346 Teacher Training
1347 (15) Jobs for Alabama's Graduates (JAG) 7,050,742
1348 (16) Liberty Learning Foundation 1,175,000
1349 (17) Mental Health Telecounseling Pilot 2,500,000
1350 Project
1351 (18) National Board Certification of 1,500,000
1352 Teachers
1353 The amounts below are minimum amounts. The balance of funds shall be expended to provide fee
1354 support to candidates seeking certification. Any unused portion of the funds shall be expended
1355 for aforementioned candidate support and professional development. Priority shall be given to
1356 candidates in certificate areas of need as determined by the State Superintendent of Education
1357 (e.g. Mathematics, Literacy, Science, English Language Arts, Career and Technical Education,
1358 etc.); candidates who agree to teach at a school with five or fewer National Board Certified
1359 Teachers for a period of three years; and additional need criteria determined by the State
1360 Superintendent of Education.
1361 a. Accomplished Teaching, Learning and 50,000
1362 Schools (ATLAS)
1363 b. Candidate Support and Professional 50,000
1364 Development
1365 During the certification process.
Page 54

During the certification process.
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1366 (19) National Board for Professional 13,712,908
1367 Teaching Standards
Page 55

13,712,908
Teaching Standards
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1368 The above appropriation includes funds to pay salary supplements and related benefit costs for
1369 Nationally Board-Certified Teachers (NBCT) and other costs of the program. Supplement amounts
1370 will be determined by the availability of funds based on the number of National Board Certified
1371 Teachers. (1) The state of Alabama will provide an annual supplement of $5,000 to any NBCT that
1372 is employed full-time in a public K-12 school and is properly certified by the state of
1373 Alabama. The existing eligibility criteria will apply: (a) NBCTs employed on a less than
1374 full-time contract on October 1 will receive a pro-rata share of the salary supplement. (b)
1375 NBCTs employed full-time after October 1 will receive a pro-rata share of the salary
1376 supplement. (c) NBCTs who earn National Board Certification in another state and are teaching
1377 full-time in Alabama on October 1 and are properly certified by the state of Alabama will
1378 receive the annual salary stipend. (d) NBCTs employed as a substitute are not eligible for the
1379 salary supplement. (e) NBCTs who are on leave of absence for more than half a school year will
1380 receive a prorated amount based on the number of months worked during the school year. (f)
1381 NBCTs will receive the salary supplement each year of the valid period of the certificate
1382 unless the Alabama Legislature declines to make the annual appropriation. (g) NBCTs must renew
1383 their certificate by the year of the certificate's expiration in order to continue receiving
1384 the salary supplement. (h) NBCTs employed in the final year of the certificate valid period
1385 will receive a prorated amount based on the number of months worked covered in that valid
1386 period. (i) NBCTs who leave after October 1 will be eligible for a prorated amount based on the
1387 months served. (j) NBCTs must remain employed with a public K-12 local Board of Education in
1388 order to continue receiving the salary supplement. (2) In addition to the supplement provided
1389 by subsection (1) of this section, classroom teachers shall be eligible for an additional
1390 supplement of $5,000 if in an instructional assignment in challenging, high poverty schools,
1391
subject to the following conditions and limitations: (a) Teacher holds a valid NBPTS
1392
certificate in Literacy, English Language Arts, English as a New Language, Math, Science,
1393
Exceptional Needs, or Career and Technical Education; and (b) School has been on the "Priority
1394
School" list 3 of the last 5 years; and/or (c) School has a graduation rate more than 10% less
1395
than the state average for 2 of the 3 most recently posted years; and/or (d) School has a free
1396
and reduced federal lunch student percentage of 75% or greater as determined by the most recent
1397
data posted or provides meals to all students through the Community Eligibility Provision. The
1398
State Department of Education shall file a report on or before September 30, 2027 with the
1399
Chairs of the Senate Committee on Finance and Taxation-Education, House Ways and
1400
Means-Education Committee, the Finance Director, and the Legislative Fiscal Officer regarding
1401
the number of classroom teachers becoming eligible and receiving the additional supplement
Page 56

the number of classroom teachers becoming eligible and receiving the additional supplement
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1402 provided in (2) above during fiscal year 2027.
1403 (20) Reach and Teach 350,000
1404 (21) Robotics Grant Program 1,250,000
1405 The above appropriation shall be expended to provide grants of not more than $3,500 per school
1406 to support robotics programs. The State Department of Education shall notify in writing all
1407 school systems, by July 1, 2026, of the availability of funding for elementary, middle and high
1408 school robotics programs. The notification shall include the grant application process and the
1409 amount of funding available to each school. No funding will be available until October 1, 2026.
1410 a. Elementary Robotics Grant Program 100,000
1411 (22) Educational Delivery Options for Public 5,000,000
1412 Schools Grant Program
1413 (23) Southern Research Institute 1,000,000
1414 The above appropriation shall be used to expand the Science, Technology, Engineering, and
1415 Mathematics (STEM) Educational Outreach Program statewide.
1416 (24) Southwest School of Deaf and Blind 198,865
1417 (25) Special Education Certified Behavior 13,500,000
1418 Analysts (Autism)
1419 (26) Special Education Pre-School Program 30,000,000
1420 (27) STEM Statewide Teacher Training and 450,000
1421 Student Outreach (Formerly Student
1422 Botanical Pilot Project)
1423 (28) Symphony in Education Program 325,000
1424 (29) Teach for America 822,000
1425 It is the intent of the Legislature that funds appropriated for Teach for America be used to
1426 employ veterans of the United States Armed Forces where possible. Any teachers employed with
1427 these funds shall only teach in the subject area for which they have demonstrated competency as
1428 determined and approved by the State Department of Education.
1429 (30) Teacher In-Service Centers 3,509,080
Page 57

(30) Teacher In-Service Centers 3,509,080
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1430 The State Superintendent of Education shall administer the In-Service Centers by confirming the
1431 areas of focus for professional development activities, monitoring and approving the
1432 professional development plan of the centers, approving the budget, and evaluating the centers
1433 on an annual basis to determine performance outcomes and identify any deficiencies and require
1434 any necessary corrective measures. Nothing herein shall require the existing in-service regions
1435 be redrawn or require the State Superintendent to distribute AMSTI, ASIMS, technology in
1436 motion, or other funds to more than the existing in-service regions. The above appropriation to
1437 the In-Service Centers shall be distributed to the In-Service Centers as provided below.
1438 a. Alabama A and M University 320,086
1439 b. Alabama at Birmingham, University of 346,848
1440 c. Alabama State University 282,287
1441 d. Alabama, University of 263,249
1442 e. Athens State University 274,838
1443 f. Auburn University 284,217
1444 g. Jacksonville State University 279,528
1445 h. Montevallo, University of 291,391
1446 i. North Alabama, University of 258,283
1447 j. South Alabama, University of 368,644
1448 k. Troy University 293,875
1449 l. West Alabama, University of 245,834
1450 (31) Teacher Professional Development 3,697,293
1451 Training
1452 The Department shall file a report with the Chairs of the House Ways and Means-Education
1453 Committee, the Senate Committee on Finance and Taxation-Education, the Finance Director, and
1454 the Legislative Fiscal Officer on the first day of the 2027 Regular Session regarding the
1455 expenditures and usage of the funds appropriated to these programs in fiscal year 2027.
1456 a. Computer Science Educator Training 300,000
Page 58

a. Computer Science Educator Training 300,000
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1457 The ALSDE shall coordinate and, as needed, allocate funds through a competitive grant process
1458 for state entities (e.g., non-profits, higher ed) to offer professional development on
1459 curricula that has been approved by the ALSDE for a computer science pathway; curricula should
1460 be open and available across multiple computing platforms (e.g., available within a web
1461 browser). Funding shall be used for professional development and teacher support. The ALSDE
1462 shall provide a report of the initiative to the Chair of the House Ways and Means-Education
1463 Committee and the Chair of the Senate Committee on Finance and Taxation-Education no later than
1464 June 15, 2027.
1465 b. Middle School Computer Programming 613,907
1466 Initiative
1467 The Department shall allocate funds through a competitive grant process for local education
1468 agencies. Each grant may be used for professional development, training, and curriculum, and
1469 shall not exceed $25,000. The Department shall provide a report of the initiative to the Chair
1470 of the House Ways and Means-Education Committee and the Chair of the Senate Committee on
1471 Finance and Taxation-Education no later than June 1, 2027.
1472 c. Special Education Professional 188,907
1473 Development Program
1474 For educators and school board members.
1475 d. Technology in Motion Program 2,594,479
1476 To train teachers (K-12) on authentic computer science and other technology program training as
1477 directed by the State Superintendent. High school and middle school teachers from math,
1478 science, and career tech will be trained to offer stand-alone Computer Science courses, and
1479 elementary teachers will be trained to integrate computer science into weekly activities,
1480 following nationally developed curricula that address the Alabama Course of Study: Digital
1481 Literacy and Computer Science.
1482 (32) Teacher Recruitment and Placement 800,000
1483 (33) Vaping Education Program 150,000
1484 The above appropriation shall be used by the Drug Education Council in coordination with the
1485 Department of Education to conduct vaping prevention education programs for elementary, middle,
1486 and high school students.
1487 (34) Youth Leadership and Development 525,000
1488 Program
Page 59

525,000
Program
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1489 For the expansion of a leadership development program for high school juniors and seniors based
1490 on the three pillars of faith, character, and patriotism.
1491 (35) Athletic Trainers Secondary School 300,000
1492 Incentive Program
1493 To be expended in accordance with Sections 34-40-31 through 34-40-35, Code of Alabama 1975.
1494 (36) Plasma Games 2,000,000
1495 (37) Big Brothers/Big Sisters 200,000
1496 (38) Alabama Shakespeare Festival 2,000,000
1497 (39) Youth Sports Initiative for Physical 200,000
1498 Wellness
1499 (f) Future Teachers of Alabama 250,000 250,000
1500 The above appropriation shall be expended to provide grants of not more than
1501 $1,500 to each senior high school to establish and support Future Teachers of
1502 Alabama programs by funding stipends of $1,000 for teachers to serve as
1503 program directors at each school and the remaining $500 being used for program
1504 activities and expenses. The State Department of Education shall notify in
1505 writing all school systems, by July 1, 2026, of the availability of funding
1506 for senior high school Future Teachers of Alabama programs. The notification
1507 shall include the grant application process and clearly defined program
1508 expectations. The Department of Education shall allocate funds to schools no
1509 later than November 1.
1510 (g) Gifted Students Program 1,675,000 1,675,000
1511 (1) Gifted Student Grant Program 1,675,000
1512 Pursuant to Section 16-1-51, Code of Alabama 1975.
1513 (h) Kindervision 250,000 250,000
1514 (i) Liability Insurance Program 17,500,000 17,500,000
1515 (j) Reading is Fundamental Program 30,000 30,000
1516 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1517 (1) ETF 753,337,316
1518 (2) ETF-Transfer 2,583,796
Page 60

(2) ETF-Transfer 2,583,796
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1519 (3) Driver Education and Training 5,145,634
1520 Fund
1521 (4) Federal and Local Funds 2,349,300,323
1522 (5) Special Education Catastrophic 5,000,000
1523 Fund
1524 Total Education, State Department of 755,921,112 2,359,445,957 3,115,367,069
1525 The funds appropriated above shall not be used to implement standards, programs or
1526 student assessments created by the Common Core State Standards Initiative after
1527 April 1, 2013.
1528 16. Educational Television Commission:
1529 (a) Educational Television Program 10,854,510 1,275,403 12,129,913
1530 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1531 (1) ETF 10,854,510
1532 (2) Federal and Local Funds 1,275,403
1533 Total Educational Television Commission 10,854,510 1,275,403 12,129,913
1534 The above appropriation is made with encouragement that it only be used for
1535 programming that is unbiased, appropriate for the audiences to which it is targeted,
1536 and fails to promote specific political or social ideology.
1537
1538
1539 17. Evaluation of Services, Alabama
1540 Commission on the:
1541 (a) Special Services Program 944,100 944,100
1542 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1543 (1) ETF 944,100
1544 Total Evaluation of Services, Alabama 944,100 944,100
1545 Commission on the
1546 18. Executive Commission on Community
1547 Services Grants, State:
1548 (a) Community Services Grants Program 12,604,798 12,604,798
Page 61

(a) Community Services Grants Program 12,604,798 12,604,798
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1549 Distributed pursuant to Section 29-2-123, Code of Alabama 1975.
1550 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1551 (1) ETF 12,604,798
1552 Total Executive Commission on Community 12,604,798 12,604,798
1553 Services Grants, State
1554 The above appropriation shall be used for grants that promote public education
1555 purposes.
1556 19. Family Practice Rural Health Board:
1557 (a) Family Practice Rural Health 3,994,823 3,994,823
1558 Program
1559 (1) Auburn Rural Health Program 500,000
1560 (2) Rural Medical Scholars Program - 962,500
1561 University of Alabama at Tuscaloosa
1562 (3) Tuskegee Area Health Education Center 89,815
1563 (TAHEC)
1564 Minimum amount.
1565 (4) UAH Rural Health Program 823,400
1566 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1567 (1) ETF 3,994,823
1568 Total Family Practice Rural Health 3,994,823 3,994,823
1569 Board
1570 20. Finance, Department of:
1571 (a) Fiscal Management Program 969,603 969,603
1572 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1573 (1) ETF 969,603
1574 Total Finance, Department of 969,603 969,603
1575 21. Finance-Teacher Unused Sick Leave:
1576 (a) Employee Benefits Program 2,500,000 2,500,000
1577 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1578 (1) ETF 2,500,000
Page 62

(1) ETF 2,500,000
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1579 Total Finance-Teacher Unused Sick Leave 2,500,000 2,500,000
1580 To be distributed by the State Comptroller to the designated beneficiaries or
1581 estates for unused sick leave pursuant to Section 16-1-18.2, Code of Alabama 1975.
1582 22. Fine Arts, Alabama School of:
1583 (a) Financial Assistance Program 14,169,452 1,139,500 15,308,952
1584 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1585 (1) ETF 14,169,452
1586 (2) Federal and Local Funds 1,139,500
1587 Total Fine Arts, Alabama School of 14,169,452 1,139,500 15,308,952
1588 23. Fire Fighters Personnel Standards
1589 and Education Commission,
1590 Alabama/Fire College:
1591 (a) Operations and Maintenance 7,209,588 5,133,118 12,342,706
1592 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1593 (1) ETF 7,209,588
1594 (2) Federal and Local Funds 5,133,118
1595 Total Fire Fighters Personnel Standards 7,209,588 5,133,118 12,342,706
1596 and Education Commission, Alabama/Fire
1597 College
1598 24. Geological Survey:
1599 (a) Discovery and Development of 618,754 618,754
1600 Mineral, Energy and Water
1601 Resources, Geologic Research and
1602 Topographic Mapping Program
1603 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1604 (1) ETF 618,754
1605 Total Geological Survey 618,754 618,754
1606 25. Governor's Office of Volunteer
1607 Services:
1608 (a) Executive Direction Program 414,140 414,140
Page 63

(a) Executive Direction Program 414,140 414,140
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1609 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1610 (1) ETF 414,140
1611 Total Governor's Office of Volunteer 414,140 414,140
1612 Services
1613 26. Health, Department of Public:
1614 (a) Alabama Medical Education 1,110,000 1,110,000
1615 Consortium
1616 (1) Rural Alabama Teaching Health Center 1,110,000
1617 (b) Administrative Services Program 1,180,079 1,180,079
1618 (c) Continuing Education for EMT 1,635,782 1,635,782
1619 Personnel
1620 With the above appropriation, the Department shall offer performance-based
1621 awards to regional EMS agencies for the purpose of providing continuing
1622 education to EMTs and strengthening the EMS infrastructure.
1623 (d) Office of Emergency Medical 1,000,000 1,000,000
1624 Services
1625 (1) Alabama Trauma Communications Center 1,000,000
1626 To be expended by the State Health Officer to improve and support the Alabama Trauma
1627 Communications Center located at the University of Alabama at Birmingham. The office shall
1628 report by March 1, 2027, how the money was spent or was planned to be spent, and what
1629 measurable improvements were expected from the spending, and report by January 1, 2028, on the
1630 extent to which goals for improvement were met or are on track to be met. The reports shall be
1631 delivered to the Governor and to the Chairs of the House Ways and Means-Education Committee and
1632 the Senate Committee on Finance and Taxation-Education.
1633 (e) Public Health Services Program 17,075,329 17,075,329
1634 (1) AIDS Alabama 600,000
1635 (2) Alabama Commission on Tick Borne 75,000
1636 Illness
1637 (3) Alabama Health Education Centers 690,000
1638 (4) Alabama Kidney Foundation 497,463
1639 (5) Impact Alabama 1,195,000
Page 64

(5) Impact Alabama 1,195,000
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1640 a. Home First Program 200,000
1641 (6) Lions Sight eye screening 500,000
1642 (7) North Alabama Rural Dental Clinic 1,450,000
1643 Residency Program
1644 In coordination with UAB.
1645 (8) Partnering in Training in Healthcare 500,000
1646 (PATH)
1647 (9) Statewide Trauma System 250,000
1648 (10) Statewide Stroke System 200,000
1649 (11) Youth Sport Safety Database 547,000
1650 (f) Primary Care Physician Residency 800,000 800,000
1651 Program
1652 For a physician residency program through the Cahaba Clinic.
1653 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1654 (1) ETF 22,801,190
1655 Total Health, Department of Public 22,801,190 22,801,190
1656 27. School of Healthcare Sciences,
1657 Alabama:
1658 (a) Financial Assistance Program 6,017,790 6,017,790
1659 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1660 (1) ETF 6,017,790
1661 Total School of Healthcare Sciences, 6,017,790 6,017,790
1662 Alabama
1663 28. Higher Education, Alabama
1664 Commission on:
1665 (a) Deferred Maintenance Program 5,000,000 5,000,000
Page 65

(a) Deferred Maintenance Program 5,000,000 5,000,000
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1666 The above appropriation is to be deposited into a separate fund to be
1667 allocated for a grant program for the Historically Black Colleges and
1668 Universities in the state. The grants are to be allocated for deferred
1669 maintenance on existing structures and cannot be utilized for new
1670 construction. The grant program shall be administered by ACHE, and ACHE shall
1671 establish rules for the implementation of the grant program, the application
1672 process for the grants, and the awarding of the grants. Grants shall be
1673 awarded based on demonstrated needs, and ACHE shall develop and implement a
1674 scoring process to evaluate each grant application, which may include the
1675 availability of matching funds from the college or university, and certify
1676 compliance with grant award following project completion. ACHE shall submit an
1677 annual report to the Governor, the Chairs of the Senate Finance and
1678 Taxation-Education Committee, House Ways and Means-Education Committee, the
1679 Finance Director and the Legislative Fiscal Officer within 30 days after
1680 September 30, 2027. The report shall include the recipient, amount, and
1681 approved use of each grant issued. Notwithstanding any other provision of law
1682 to the contrary, any of the above funds which remain unexpended on September
1683 30, 2027, shall not revert, but shall be reappropriated in the fiscal year
1684 beginning October 1, 2027, to be expended for the grant program.
1685 (b) Planning and Coordination 8,533,866 486,239 9,020,105
1686 Services Program
1687 (1) FAFSA Completion Assistance 580,000
1688 (2) Industry Credential Directory 100,000
1689 Of the above appropriation, $100,000 shall be allocated for a non-public facing credential
1690 registry for college and university credentials. The credential registry shall include all
1691 degree and non-degree credentials offered at public colleges and universities. Data from the
1692 college and university credential registry shall be shared via a data sharing agreement to the
1693 public facing Alabama Credential Registry managed by the Alabama Department of Workforce.
1694 (3) Operations and Maintenance 4,618,866
1695 (4) Pathways to Progress 600,000
1696 (5) ReEngage Program 1,935,000
Page 66

(5) ReEngage Program 1,935,000
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1697 The above appropriation and any prior appropriations from the Education Trust Fund for the
1698 ReEngage Program are to be deposited into a separate fund to be allocated under the provisions
1699 of Sections 16-33D-3 through 16-33D-7, Code of Alabama 1975.
1700
1701
1702 (6) Retain Alabama 650,000
1703 The Retain Alabama project will provide digital marketing strategies targeting soon-to-be
1704 college graduates, promotional materials about Alabama and career opportunities, and other
1705 strategies to retain Alabama College graduates initiated by the Executive Director in
1706 collaboration and coordination with Innovate Alabama. The Retention Initiative would help
1707 retain Alabama College graduates by: (1) Identifying internships, co-op opportunities, and
1708 entry-level jobs at emerging companies and established companies in Alabama; (2) Partnering
1709 with Alabama colleges and universities to promote these career opportunities to Alabama college
1710 students throughout the State; and (3) Creating opportunities for Alabama college students to
1711 learn more about communities throughout Alabama, while also engaging with other students to
1712 create a cohort environment.
1713 a. Alabama Higher Education Partnership 250,000
1714 Student Retention Council Program
1715 b. Retain Alabama Project 400,000
1716 Administered by ACHE
1717 (7) Study Alabama 50,000
1718 (c) Student Financial Aid Program 39,790,549 1,000,000 40,790,549
1719 (1) Alabama National Guard Educational 9,831,114
1720 Assistance Scholarships
1721 To be expended in accordance with Sections 31-10-1 through 31-10-5 and Sections 31-10-20
1722 through 31-10-24, Code of Alabama 1975.
1723 (2) Alabama Student Assistance Program 10,000,000
1724 (3) Birmingham Promise Scholarship Program 892,500
1725 (4) Educational Grants Program (Alabama 10,500,000
1726 Student Grant Program)
Page 67

10,500,000
Student Grant Program)
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1727 To be expended in accordance with Sections 16-33A-1 through 16-33A-11, Code of Alabama 1975.
1728 Private institutions receiving state grant funds under this provision shall make their best
1729 effort to use the equivalent of 10% of Federal Work Study allocations for the purpose of
1730 tutoring and mentoring students in grades K-12 to better prepare them for graduation, college
1731 entry and retention. Institutions shall work with their respective governing boards to develop
1732 and implement this effort.
1733 (5) Math and Science Teacher Education 1,000,000
1734 Program
1735 To be expended pursuant to Sections 16-5-50, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975. ACHE shall submit
1736 an annual report to the Governor and to the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Finance and
1737 Taxation-Education, House Ways and Means-Education Committee and the Legislative Fiscal Officer
1738 within 30 days after September 30, 2027, including updates on all aspects of the program.
1739 (6) Policeman's Survivor Tuition, Estimated 466,935
1740 To be expended under the provisions of Section 36-21-105, Code of Alabama 1975.
1741 (7) Indian Affairs Scholarship Program 100,000
1742 (8) Alabama Law Enforcement Officers' 8,000,000
1743 Family Scholarship Program
1744 (d) Support of Other Educational 8,425,063 7,144,819 15,569,882
1745 Activities Program
1746 (1) Articulation and General Studies 999,589
1747 Committee (AGSC)/ Statewide Transfer
1748 and Articulation Reporting System
1749 (STARS)
1750 To be expended in accordance with Section 16-5-8(e), Code of Alabama 1975. The purpose of
1751 AGSC/STARS is to provide Alabama college students with a simplified, seamless, and streamlined
1752 transfer process by providing them with accurate transfer information through state-approved
1753 transfer guides. STARS is housed at Troy University. The Commission shall work to ensure that
1754 dual enrollment courses apply towards a degree where applicable.
1755 (2) EPSCoR (Research) Program 1,460,184
1756 Of the above appropriation, at least thirty percent (30%) may be expended for the operations
1757 and maintenance of the Alabama Experimental Program to Stimulate Competitive Research (Alabama
1758 EPSCoR) administrative offices located at the University of Alabama at Birmingham.
Page 68

EPSCoR) administrative offices located at the University of Alabama at Birmingham.
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1759 (3) Network of Alabama Academic Libraries 384,076
1760 ACHE shall provide for the participation of Athens State University in the Network of Alabama
1761 Academic Libraries.
1762 (4) Southern Regional Education Board 831,214
1763 (SREB)
1764 (5) STEM Major Teacher Recruitment 4,500,000
1765 (6) Best and Brightest STEM Pilot Program 250,000
1766 Pursuant to the provisions of Act 2020-204.
1767 (e) Support of State Universities 6,491,283 6,491,283
1768 Program
1769 (1) Alabama Agricultural Land Grant 6,491,283
1770 Alliance
1771 a. McIntire-Stennis Forestry Research 539,524
1772 Initiative Matching Program
1773 b. State Matching Funds 5,006,831
1774 To be distributed as a state match for federal funds for those institutions in the Alliance
1775 required to provide matching state funds for the first time in the fiscal year 2000.
1776 c. Tuskegee University - USDA Matching 944,928
1777 Funds
1778 (f) Support of Other State Programs 18,648,120 18,648,120
1779 (1) AKEEP Education and Teacher Recruitment 400,000
1780 Partnership
1781 (2) Adaptive and Disability Sports 60,000
1782 Education
1783 (3) Alabama Civil Air Patrol 155,000
1784 (4) Alabama Forestry Commission Education 200,000
1785 Program
1786 (5) Alabama Forestry Foundation Black Belt 532,000
1787 Initiative
1788 (6) Alabama Recruit and Retain Urban/Rural 700,000
1789 Teachers
Page 69

700,000
Teachers
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1790 This appropriation shall be distributed equally between Alabama A&M University and Athens State
1791 University and shall be used to recruit, train, and mentor teachers.
1792 (7) Alabama Trails Foundation 340,000
1793 (8) Black Belt Adventures 475,000
1794 (9) Black Belt Treasures 350,000
1795 (10) National Computer Forensics Institute 650,000
1796 (11) Resource Conservation and Development 8,962,744
1797 Programs (RC and D)
1798 (12) Soil and Water Conservation Committee 3,023,376
1799 Program
1800 (13) State of Alabama Humanities Foundation 400,000
1801 (14) USS Alabama Battleship 1,550,000
1802 (15) Alabama HBCU Cares 650,000
1803 (16) Motorsports Hall of Fame 200,000
1804 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1805 (1) ETF 79,953,881
1806 (2) ETF-Transfer 6,935,000
1807 (3) Federal and Local Funds 7,631,058
1808 (4) Math and Science Teacher 1,000,000
1809 Education Program Funds
1810 Total Higher Education, Alabama 86,888,881 8,631,058 95,519,939
1811 Commission on
1812 In addition to the above appropriations, any scholarship funds transferred from the
1813 State Department of Education for the Alabama Teacher Recruitment Incentive Program
1814 (ATRIP) shall not revert.
1815 29. Historical Commission, Alabama :
1816 (a) Historical Resources Management 5,436,751 5,436,751
1817 Program
1818 (1) Operating Grant Program 3,500,000
Page 70

(1) Operating Grant Program 3,500,000
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1819 To be distributed as grants to monuments to commemorate historical events and places,
1820 historical skills centers, cultural heritage parks, historic sites, commissions, boards,
1821 agencies, and authorities that are not owned, operated, or otherwise under the control of the
1822 Alabama Historical Commission or other state agencies. Grants will be awarded to entities that
1823 reflect a historical education-based mission and concentrate on historical educational
1824 programming. Preference shall be given to: (1) any property constructed prior to 1840 that is
1825 listed in or eligible for the National Register of Historic Places and that are publicly owned
1826 and accessible to the public; or (2) any property in Alabama built in 1943 or before, and is
1827 listed in or eligible for the National Register of Historic Places or any property built after
1828 1943 that significantly contributed to the civil rights movement. Grant amounts shall not
1829 exceed $100,000 for any one entity and must be used within two years of receiving, with the
1830 first three grants reserved for Old State Bank for $100,000, Somerville Courthouse for $75,000,
1831 and Princess Theater for $85,000. Grants will not be awarded to any entity receiving funding
1832 directly or indirectly from the Education Trust Fund or the General Fund nor may grants be
1833 awarded to any private or for-profit business or organization.
1834 a. Grants to Historical Sites 500,000
1835 A minimum of $300,000 of the grants shall be distributed to historical sites, or monuments
1836 related to the civil rights movement, as determined by the Commission.
1837 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1838 (1) ETF-Transfer 5,436,751
1839 Total Historical Commission, Alabama 5,436,751 5,436,751
1840 30. Human Resources, Department of:
1841 (a) Fostering Hope Scholarship 1,205,608 1,205,608
1842 Program
Page 71

1,205,608 1,205,608
Program
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1843 To be expended under the provisions of Sections 38-12B-1 through 38-12B-10,
1844 Code of Alabama 1975. The Department shall file a report with the Chairs of
1845 the Senate Committee on Finance and Taxation-Education, House Ways and
1846 Means-Education Committee, the Legislative Fiscal Officer and the Finance
1847 Director on October 1, 2026, regarding the total number of scholarships
1848 awarded for the Fall term of the 2025-2026 academic year and the institution
1849 attended by the scholarship recipients. The report shall also include the name
1850 of each scholarship recipient and the number of years the recipient has
1851 received a scholarship.
1852 (b) Human Services Program - Jobs 92,484,081 92,484,081
1853 Child Care and After School Child
1854 Care Program and Family and
1855 Children Services Program
1856 The Commissioner of the Department of Human Resources shall report
1857 semi-annually to the Chairs of the Senate Finance and Taxation-Education
1858 Committee, the House Ways and Means-Education Committee, Permanent Joint
1859 Legislative Committee on Finances and Budgets, the Finance Director, and the
1860 Legislative Fiscal Officer regarding the expenditure of federal stimulus funds
1861 received by the Department for Child Care and After School Care Programs. Such
1862 report shall include, but not be limited to, specific amounts expended for
1863 professional development and a summary of summer and after-school programming
1864 across the state.
1865 (1) Black Belt Eye Care Consortium 375,000
1866 (2) Bell Center 100,000
1867 (3) ASD Assessments, Services, and 500,000
1868 Therapies
1869 (4) Educating Children at Residential 1,000,000
1870 Hospitals
1871 (5) Greater Alabama Child Development 926,114
1872 Program
1873 For rural daycare.
1874 (6) Roebuck Early Childhood Learning Center 75,000
Page 72

(6) Roebuck Early Childhood Learning Center 75,000
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1875 (7) Summer EBT Program Administration 10,000,000
1876 (8) Wiregrass Rehabilitation Center 570,932
1877 For daycare.
1878 (9) Boys and Girls Club of Alabama 360,000
1879 Of this amount, $360,000 shall be from the Education Trust Fund and is to be expended
1880 exclusively to contract with the Boys and Girls Clubs of Alabama for TANF approved programs.
1881 The Boys and Girls Clubs of Alabama shall provide reports and/or information, per the
1882 Department's request, and/or contract to enhance accoutability of any TANF funds. The
1883 Department shall provide to the Chairs of the House Ways and Means-General Fund Committee and
1884 the Senate Finance and Taxation-General Fund Committee and the Legislative Fiscal Officer a
1885 report by the first day of the 2027 Regular Session on the individual contracts and amounts and
1886 the expenditure usage of the funds.
1887 (c) Human Services Program - Jobs 14,090,281 14,090,281
1888 Opportunities and Basic Skills
1889 Training (JOBS) Program and
1890 Family and Children Services
1891 Program
1892 (1) Child Advocacy Centers 1,600,000
1893 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1894 (1) ETF-Transfer 107,779,970
1895 Total Human Resources, Department of 107,779,970 107,779,970
1896 No funds from the sales tax for the issuance of food stamps shall be reverted by the
1897 Department of Human Resources to the Education Trust Fund. Any funds appropriated
1898 which are in excess of the amount needed to fund the food stamp program shall be
1899 retained by the Department and expended for direct services to children, including
1900 the TANF program.
1901 31. Law Enforcement Agency, State:
1902 (a) Department of Public Safety 336,041 336,041
1903 Program
1904 (b) State Bureau of Investigation 2,643,157 2,643,157
1905 Program
Page 73

2,643,157 2,643,157
Program
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1906 (1) School Mapping 2,000,000
1907 To be expended under the provisions of Sections 16-22B-1 through 16-22B-6, Code of Alabama,
1908 1975.
1909 (2) School Safety 572,446
1910 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1911 (1) ETF-Transfer 2,979,198
1912 Total Law Enforcement Agency, State 2,979,198 2,979,198
1913 32. Library Service, Alabama Public:
1914 (a) Public Library Service Program 15,023,291 3,162,662 18,185,953
1915 (1) Alabama Supreme Court Library 550,000
1916 (2) Homework Alabama 395,000
1917 (3) Public Libraries 6,600,000
1918 To be distributed to public libraries within the State. In order to receive funding from this
1919 program, the library must be in compliance with Administrative Code Rule 520-2-2-.03.
1920 (4) Virtual Library Project 3,611,637
1921 In order to receive funding from this program, the library must be in compliance with
1922 Administrative Code Rule 520-2-2-.03.
1923 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1924 (1) ETF 15,023,291
1925 (2) Federal and Local Funds 3,162,662
1926 Total Library Service, Alabama Public 15,023,291 3,162,662 18,185,953
1927 33. Lieutenant Governor, Office of the:
1928 (a) Lieutenant Governor's Commission 167,132 167,132
1929 on 21st Century Workforce
1930 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1931 (1) ETF 167,132
1932 Total Lieutenant Governor, Office of 167,132 167,132
1933 the
1934 34. Marine Environmental Sciences
1935 Consortium/Dauphin Island Sea Lab:
Page 74

Consortium/Dauphin Island Sea Lab:
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1936 (a) Support of Other Educational 6,852,868 14,262,878 21,115,746
1937 Activities Program
1938 (1) Mississippi-Alabama Sea Grant 125,000
1939 Consortium
1940 (2) Mobile Bay National Estuary Program 125,000
1941 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1942 (1) ETF 6,852,868
1943 (2) Federal and Local Funds 14,262,878
1944 Total Marine Environmental Sciences 6,852,868 14,262,878 21,115,746
1945 Consortium/Dauphin Island Sea Lab
1946 35. Mathematics and Science, Alabama
1947 School of:
1948 (a) Financial Assistance Program 13,017,720 1,502,000 14,519,720
1949 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1950 (1) ETF 13,017,720
1951 (2) Federal and Local Funds 1,502,000
1952 Total Mathematics and Science, Alabama 13,017,720 1,502,000 14,519,720
1953 School of
1954 36. Medical Scholarship Awards, Board
1955 of:
1956 (a) Support of Other Educational 2,440,014 1,000,000 3,440,014
1957 Activities Program
Page 75

2,440,014 1,000,000 3,440,014
Activities Program
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1958 The Board in determining those areas in greatest need of medical service shall
1959 primarily be guided by information, on the rural primary care service areas
1960 that have a deficit of primary-care physicians, provided by the most recent
1961 Status Report of the Alabama Primary Care Physician Workforce from the Office
1962 for Family Health Education & Research at the UAB Huntsville Regional Medical
1963 Campus. Other factors used by the Board in determining areas of greatest need
1964 shall include the practice locations agreed to by people granted loans
1965 beforehand by the Board but who have not yet started clinical practice, or
1966 started practice too late to have been included in the most recent Status
1967 Report. The Board shall give preference to physicians that reside in the area
1968 of greatest need. The Board shall file a report with the Chair of the Senate
1969 Committee on Finance and Taxation-Education, the Chair of the House Ways and
1970 Means-Education Committee, the Legislative Fiscal Officer and the Finance
1971 Director on October 1, 2026. The Board’s report shall include, if determined,
1972 where each student who has not started clinical practice has contracted to
1973 practice clinical medicine to repay his or her loans. If that area is not a
1974 rural primary-care service area identified as having a deficit of primary-care
1975 physicians by the most recent Status Report of the Alabama Primary Care
1976 Physician Workforce, the Board in its report shall state why it allowed that
1977 location as a place where that student could practice to repay his or her
1978 loans. The report shall also include the total number of scholarships awarded
1979 for the fall term of the 2025-2026 academic year and the institution attended
1980 by the scholarship recipients. The report shall also include the name of each
1981 scholarship recipient and the number of years the recipient has received a
1982 scholarship and, if determined, where the recipient has contracted to practice
1983 clinical medicine to repay his or her loans. The report shall also report
1984 where contract holders were working in clinical practice to repay their loans,
1985 how many in each location, where physicians who had repaid their loans worked
1986 to do so, and how many in each location. The report also shall detail the
1987 Board’s budget and operating expenses for the 2025-2026 fiscal year.
1988 (1) Alabama Physician Assistants Service 500,000
1989 Program (Loan Repayment)
Page 76

500,000
Program (Loan Repayment)
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
1990 To be expended under the provisions of Sections 16-47-220 through 16-47-225, Code of Alabama
1991 1975. The Board shall file a report with the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Finance and
1992 Taxation-Education, House Ways and Means-Education Committee, the Legislative Fiscal Officer
1993 and the Finance Director on October 1, 2026, regarding the expenditures and the condition and
1994 accomplishments of the program, including start-up preparations.
1995 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
1996 (1) ETF 2,440,014
1997 (2) Federal and Local Funds 1,000,000
1998 Total Medical Scholarship Awards, Board 2,440,014 1,000,000 3,440,014
1999 of
2000 37. Mental Health, Department of:
2001 (a) Institutional Treatment and Care 57,706,719 57,706,719
2002 of Intellectually Disabled
2003 Program
2004 (1) ARC-type Community-based Programs 4,282,409
2005 To fund ARC-type community-based programs pursuant to a formula developed by the Department of
2006 Mental Health. Any ARC program receiving funds for the first time in fiscal year 2027 shall
2007 receive a minimum of $50,000.
2008 (2) Camp ASCCA 540,000
2009 (3) Developmental Disability Nurse 800,000
2010 Delegation Program
2011 (4) Eagles' Wings Program 625,000
2012 (5) Rainbow Omega 625,000
2013 (6) Residential Habilitation 960,000
2014 (7) Community Provider Rate Increases 6,750,000
2015 (8) Helinski Program 250,000
2016 To provide mental health support for high school students, particularly those involved in
2017 athletics through courses on mental health literacy, help-seeking, and bystander intervention.
2018 (b) Institutional Treatment and Care 16,483,540 16,483,540
2019 of Mental Illness Program
Page 77

16,483,540 16,483,540
of Mental Illness Program
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2020 (1) School-Based Mental Health Services 5,500,000
2021 Collaboration
2022 (2) Community Provider Rate Increases 3,000,000
2023 (3) For services to Children and Youth with 4,750,000
2024 Severe Emotional Disturbance or Autism
2025 Spectrum Disorder
2026 To be used for services to children and youth with severe emotional disturbance or autism
2027 spectrum disorder. The ETF funding provided in this act shall be combined with funding provided
2028 in the State General Fund appropriations act so that a total of at least $11,000,000 in state
2029 funds is allocated for services to those children and youth.
2030 (c) Special Services Program 7,024,436 7,024,436
2031 (1) Alabama Interagency Autism Coordinating 438,900
2032 Council
2033 a. Regional Centers 225,000
2034 (d) Substance Abuse Program 2,892,794 2,892,794
2035 (1) Community Provider Rate Increases 1,000,000
2036 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2037 (1) ETF-Transfer 84,107,489
2038 Total Mental Health, Department of 84,107,489 84,107,489
2039 Of the above appropriation to the Department of Mental Health a portion shall be
2040 used to develop and implement best practices and strategies, in conjunction with the
2041 State Department of Education, designed to address the mental health needs,
2042 including attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder and other anger disorders, of
2043 children and adolescents in public schools.
2044 38. Music Hall of Fame:
2045 (a) Fine Arts Program 214,127 330,000 544,127
2046 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2047 (1) ETF 214,127
2048 (2) Music Hall of Fame Fund, 330,000
2049 Estimated
2050 Total Music Hall of Fame 214,127 330,000 544,127
Page 78

Total Music Hall of Fame 214,127 330,000 544,127
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2051 39. Nursing, Alabama Board of:
2052 (a) Professional and Occupational 766,027 13,080,547 13,846,574
2053 Licensing and Regulation Program
2054 The above appropriation shall be expended pursuant to the provisions of
2055 Sections 34-21-60 through 34-21-63, Code of Alabama 1975.
2056 (1) Advanced Degrees Scholarships 150,000
2057 For scholarships for advanced degrees to train instructors to teach nursing classes in Alabama
2058 colleges and universities, notwithstanding the limiting provisions of Sections 34-21-60 through
2059 34-21-63, Code of Alabama 1975.
2060 (2) Loan Repayment Program 450,000
2061 For a loan repayment program for advanced-practice nurses, notwithstanding the limiting
2062 provisions of Sections 34-21-60 through 34-21-63, Code of Alabama 1975. The Board shall file a
2063 report with the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Finance and Taxation-Education, House Ways
2064 and Means-Education Committee, the Legislative Fiscal Officer and the Finance Director by
2065 October 1, 2026, regarding the total number of scholarships and loans awarded for the Fall term
2066 of the 2025-2026 academic year and the institution attended by the scholarship and loan
2067 recipients. The report shall also include the name of each scholarship and loan recipient and
2068 the number of years the recipient has received a scholarship or loan.
2069 (3) Advanced Practice Nurse Loan Program 150,000
2070 For a loan repayment program for advanced-practice nurses, notwithstanding the limiting
2071 provisions of Sections 34-21-150 through 34-21-155, Code of Alabama 1975. The Board shall file
2072 a report with the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Finance and Taxation-Education, House Ways
2073 and Means-Education Committee, the Legislative Fiscal Officer and the Finance Director by
2074 October 1, 2026, regarding the total number of scholarships and loans awarded for the Fall term
2075 of the 2025-2026 academic year and the institution attended by the scholarship and loan
2076 recipients. The report shall also include the name of each scholarship and loan recipient and
2077 the number of years the recipient has received a scholarship or loan.
2078 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2079 (1) ETF 766,027
2080 (2) Alabama Board of Nursing Trust 13,080,547
2081 Fund
2082 Total Nursing, Alabama Board of 766,027 13,080,547 13,846,574
Page 79

Total Nursing, Alabama Board of 766,027 13,080,547 13,846,574
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2083 40. Optometric Scholarship Awards,
2084 Board of:
2085 (a) Support of Other Educational 200,000 50,000 250,000
2086 Activities Program
2087 To be expended under the provisions of Sections 34-22-60 through 34-22-65,
2088 Code of Alabama 1975.
2089 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2090 (1) ETF 200,000
2091 (2) Optometric Scholarship Award Fund 50,000
2092 Total Optometric Scholarship Awards, 200,000 50,000 250,000
2093 Board of
2094 41. Peace Officers' Standards and
2095 Training Commission, Alabama:
2096 (a) Professional and Occupational 261,089 1,945,929 2,207,018
2097 Licensing and Regulation Program
2098 (b) Certified Law Enforcement Academy 2,162,000 1,000,000 3,162,000
2099 Program
2100 (1) Regional Training Academies 2,162,000
2101 To be allocated to the five regional training academies, consistent with the provisions of
2102 Section 36-21-47.1, Code of Alabama 1975, in a fair and equitable manner.
2103 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2104 (1) ETF 2,423,089
2105 (2) Alabama Peace Officers' Standards 2,945,929
2106 and Training Fund - as provided
2107 in Sections 36-21-40 through
2108 36-21-51, Code of Alabama 1975
2109 Total Peace Officers' Standards and 2,423,089 2,945,929 5,369,018
2110 Training Commission, Alabama
2111 42. Physical Fitness, State Commission
2112 on:
Page 80

on:
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2113 (a) Advisory Services Program 2,711,631 5,288 2,716,919
2114 (1) Alabama Sports Council 607,260
2115 (2) Alabama Sports Festival 1,105,467
2116 (3) Alabama Sports Hall of Fame 635,000
2117 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2118 (1) ETF 2,711,631
2119 (2) Federal and Local Funds 5,288
2120 Total Physical Fitness, State 2,711,631 5,288 2,716,919
2121 Commission on
2122 43. Public Education Employee Injury
2123 Compensation Board:
2124 (a) Public Education Employee Injury 15,600,000 15,600,000
2125 Compensation Program
2126 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2127 (1) ETF-Transfer 15,600,000
2128 Total Public Education Employee Injury 15,600,000 15,600,000
2129 Compensation Board
2130 44. Rehabilitation Services, Department
2131 of:
2132 (a) Direct Client Services for the 68,884,564 223,374,952 292,259,516
2133 Handicapped Program
2134 (1) Alabama Head and Spinal Cord Injury 1,000,000
2135 (2) Children's Rehabilitation Services 12,050,611
2136 Of the above appropriation, the agency will pay to each hospital the standard per diem paid by
2137 the Alabama Medicaid Agency for services relating to scoliosis and spina bifida medical care.
2138 (3) Disability Resource Network 150,000
2139 (4) Early Intervention Program 14,690,685
2140 (5) Education of Dependents of Blind 10,399
2141 Parents
Page 81

10,399
Parents
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2142 The above appropriation shall be allocated for reimbursement to every state institution of
2143 higher learning, college, university, community college, or junior college, in which benefits
2144 are given to dependents of blind parents under the provisions of Sections 16-33-1 through
2145 16-33-12, Code of Alabama 1975.
2146 (6) Hemophilia 1,289,809
2147 (7) Homebound 8,645,509
2148 (8) Rehabilitation Services 24,056,790
2149 a. Teaching Children With Disabilities 128,213
2150 (9) Respite Related Services and Training 315,000
2151 (10) Exceptional Foundation 150,000
2152 (11) Physician-Assisted Autism Diagnostic 1,500,000
2153 (PAAD) Clinic Models
2154 For statewide autism assessments.
2155 (12) Rehabilitation Projects 2,110,631
2156 (13) Traumatic Brain Injury Program 2,552,442
2157 (14) United Ability 100,000
2158 (15) UCP Mobile 100,000
2159 (16) Alabama Office on Disability 162,688
2160 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2161 (1) ETF 67,884,564
2162 (2) ETF-Transfer 1,000,000
2163 (3) Alabama Head and Spinal Cord 1,000,000
2164 Injury Trust Fund
2165 (4) Federal and Local Funds 222,374,952
2166 Total Rehabilitation Services, 68,884,564 223,374,952 292,259,516
2167 Department of
2168 The above appropriation to the Department of Rehabilitation Services -
2169 Rehabilitation Projects may be used to contract with providers of cerebral palsy
2170 services.
2171 45. Revenue, Department of:
2172 (a) Education Savings Account Program 101,250,000 150,000,000 251,250,000
Page 82

(a) Education Savings Account Program 101,250,000 150,000,000 251,250,000
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2173 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2174 (1) ETF 1,250,000
2175 (2) ETF-Transfer 100,000,000
2176 (3) CHOOSE Act Fund, Estimated 150,000,000
2177 Total Revenue, Department of 101,250,000 150,000,000 251,250,000
2178 46. Sickle Cell Oversight and
2179 Regulatory Commission, Alabama :
2180 (a) Support of Other Educational 1,931,613 1,931,613
2181 Activities Program
2182 (1) Commission Travel and Other Expenses 60,973
2183 (2) University and Community-based Sickle 1,870,640
2184 Cell Programs
2185 To fund university and community-based Sickle Cell programs which were funded from the ETF
2186 budget in fiscal year 2000. These funds shall be distributed proportionately to the
2187 distribution made in fiscal year 2003.
2188 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2189 (1) ETF 1,931,613
2190 Total Sickle Cell Oversight and 1,931,613 1,931,613
2191 Regulatory Commission, Alabama
2192 47. Supercomputer Authority, Alabama :
2193 (a) Information Technology Services 23,973,106 6,652,703 30,625,809
2194 Program
2195 The above appropriation is to be expended in accordance with Sections
2196 41-10-390 through 41-10-406, Code of Alabama 1975.
2197 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2198 (1) ETF-Transfer 23,973,106
2199 (2) Supercomputer Revolving Fund, 6,652,703
2200 Estimated
2201 Total Supercomputer Authority, Alabama 23,973,106 6,652,703 30,625,809
Page 83

Total Supercomputer Authority, Alabama 23,973,106 6,652,703 30,625,809
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2202 48. U.S. Space and Rocket Center
2203 Commission (Formerly Space Science
2204 Exhibit Commission, Alabama):
2205 (a) Special Services Program 3,200,000 46,055,969 49,255,969
2206 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2207 (1) ETF 3,200,000
2208 (2) Federal and Local Funds 46,055,969
2209 Total U.S. Space and Rocket Center 3,200,000 46,055,969 49,255,969
2210 Commission (Formerly Space Science
2211 Exhibit Commission, Alabama)
2212 49. Veterans Affairs, Department of:
2213 (a) Administration of Veteran's 2,896,956 2,896,956
2214 Affairs Program
2215 (b) Student Financial Aid Program, 50,864,944 50,864,944
2216 Estimated
2217 For reimbursement to every state institution of higher learning, college,
2218 university, community college, junior college or technical college in which
2219 benefits are given to veterans, their spouses, widows, or children under the
2220 provisions of Sections 31-6-1 through 31-6-17, Code of Alabama 1975.
2221 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2222 (1) ETF 53,761,900
2223 Total Veterans Affairs, Department of 53,761,900 53,761,900
2224 50. Workforce, Alabama Department of:
2225 (a) Industrial Development Program 20,039,256 20,039,256
2226 (1) STEM Council 4,709,571
2227 The above appropriation shall be used for regional STEM hub grants and shall be in
2228 collaboration with the State Department of Education.
2229 (2) Alabama Workforce Board 3,000,000
Page 84

(2) Alabama Workforce Board 3,000,000
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2230 To manage the Alabama Credential Registry, to develop the annual Compendium of Valuable
2231 Credentials by using the two-tiered non-degree credential quality assurance review process
2232 established in the bylaws of the Alabama Committee on Credentialing and Career Pathways, and to
2233 provide technical assistance to credential providers in registering credentials to the Alabama
2234 Credential Registry.
2235 (3) Alabama Office of Apprenticeship 3,729,685
2236 (4) Marketing Campaign for Technical 900,000
2237 Education
2238 (5) Data Information and Retention Program 900,000
2239 (Formerly Talent Triad)
2240 (6) Forest Worker Training Institute 500,000
2241 For logging operation equipment and training.
2242 (7) Focused Talent Retention Initiative 400,000
2243 Administered by EDPA.
2244 (8) Huntsville Hospital Health System 2,500,000
2245 For workforce development for in-demand health professionals.
2246 (9) Individual Training Accounts Pilot 300,000
2247 Program
2248 (10) Rural Psychiatry Residency Program 200,000
2249 (11) Rural Transportation Program 300,000
2250 (12) University of South Alabama Health 1,000,000
2251 System
2252 For workforce development classroom, equipment, law enforcement, and teaching needs.
2253 (13) Veteran's Resources Center 300,000
2254 (14) Workforce Piloting Solutions 300,000
2255 (15) Workforce Program Enhancements 1,000,000
2256 (b) Skills Enhancement and Employment 2,341,600 74,500,000 76,841,600
2257 Opportunities Program
2258 (c) Administrative Services Program 7,000,000 7,000,000
2259 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2260 (1) ETF 29,380,856
Page 85

(1) ETF 29,380,856
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2261 (2) Federal and Local Funds 74,500,000
2262 Total Workforce, Alabama Department of 29,380,856 74,500,000 103,880,856
2263 51. Youth Services, Department of:
2264 (a) Financial Assistance Program 8,522,182 8,522,182
2265 (School District)
2266 The above appropriation shall be expended by the Youth Services Department
2267 School District in a manner consistent with the funding formula cooperatively
2268 established by the Youth Services Board and the State Board of Education
2269 pursuant to the provisions of Sections 44-1-70 through 44-1-78, Code of
2270 Alabama 1975.
2271 (b) Youth Services Program 55,243,328 55,243,328
2272 (c) Special Programming for 3,565,732 3,565,732
2273 Achievement Network (SPAN)
2274 Program
2275 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2276 (1) ETF-Transfer 67,331,242
2277 Total Youth Services, Department of 67,331,242 67,331,242
2278 It is the intent of the Legislature for the Department of Youth Services ensure that
2279 each step of each salary schedule for each type of education support personnel
2280 provides an hourly rate of not less than $15 per hour, based on the number of
2281 contract days and number of hours per day required by the job description for that
2282 class and type of employee.
2283 C. Colleges and Universities:
2284 1. Alabama Agricultural and Mechanical
2285 University, Board of Trustees:
2286 (a) Operations and Maintenance and 58,231,184 104,319,143 162,550,327
2287 Program Support
2288 (1) Artificial Intelligence, Cybersecurity 125,000
2289 and STEM Enhancements
2290 (2) State Black Archives Research Center 500,000
2291 and Museum
Page 86

500,000
and Museum
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2292 To be allocated equally among the State Black Archives Center and Museum, Scottsboro Boys
2293 Museum, and Judge Horton Civil Justice Learning Center.
2294 (b) Extension-Urban Affairs and 4,084,765 4,084,765
2295 Non-Traditional Land Grant
2296 Programs
2297 Pursuant to Knight v. Alabama Final Settlement Agreement.
2298 (c) Agricultural Research Station 432,285 432,285
2299 Fixed Costs
2300 Pursuant to Knight v. Alabama Final Settlement Agreement.
2301 (d) Auxiliary Enterprises 34,612,894 34,612,894
2302 (e) Restricted Funds 55,151,763 55,151,763
2303 (f) Agricultural Research and 1,305,883 1,305,883
2304 Extension-State Match
2305 (g) The Virginia Caples Learning 100,000 100,000
2306 Living Institute
2307 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2308 (1) ETF 64,154,117
2309 (2) Federal and Other Funds 194,083,800
2310 Total Alabama Agricultural and 64,154,117 194,083,800 258,237,917
2311 Mechanical University, Board of
2312 Trustees
2313 2. Alabama A and M University, Board
2314 of Trustees-Miles College
2315 Consortium:
2316 (a) Alabama A and M University-Miles 493,486 493,486
2317 College Consortium
2318 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2319 (1) ETF 493,486
2320 Total Alabama A and M University, Board 493,486 493,486
2321 of Trustees-Miles College Consortium
Page 87

493,486 493,486
of Trustees-Miles College Consortium
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2322 3. Alabama State University, Board of
2323 Trustees:
2324 (a) Operations and Maintenance and 69,335,841 76,578,182 145,914,023
2325 Program Support
2326 (1) Alabama Department of Forensic Sciences 100,000
2327 $25,000 per quarter shall be transferred to the Alabama Department of Forensic Sciences -
2328 Forensic Services Trust Fund for the building occupied by the department at the Alabama State
2329 University campus.
2330 (b) Auxiliary Enterprises 19,474,816 19,474,816
2331 (c) Restricted Funds 30,245,541 30,245,541
2332 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2333 (1) ETF 69,335,841
2334 (2) Federal and Other Funds 126,298,539
2335 Total Alabama State University, Board 69,335,841 126,298,539 195,634,380
2336 of Trustees
2337 4. Alabama, The University of, Board
2338 of Trustees:
2339 (a) Operations and Maintenance and 284,765,168 1,017,406,959 1,302,172,127
2340 Program Support for the
2341 University of Alabama at
2342 Tuscaloosa
2343 (1) Alabama Small Business Development 961,600
2344 Centers
2345 (2) Alabama Transportation Research 6,000,000
2346 (3) Institute for Automotive Engineering 1,000,000
2347 (4) Rural Health Care Program 600,000
2348 (5) State of Alabama Water Resource Center 1,360,000
2349 (b) Operations and Maintenance and 439,140,008 5,033,457,590 5,472,597,598
2350 Program Support for the
2351 University of Alabama at
2352 Birmingham
Page 88

439,140,008 5,033,457,590 5,472,597,598
Birmingham
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2353 (1) Alabama Drug Discovery Alliance 1,400,000
2354 In collaboration with the Southern Research Institute.
2355 (2) Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis (ALS) 750,000
2356 Clinic
2357 (3) Center for Clinical and Transitional 500,000
2358 Science
2359 (4) Genome Alabama 2,000,000
2360 In collaboration with the Hudson Alpha Institute.
2361 (5) High School and Middle School Athletic 356,765
2362 Training Programs
2363 (6) Underserved Communities Dental Program 201,473
2364 (7) Rural Hospitals Resource Center 1,250,000
2365 (8) School of Optometry 250,000
2366 (9) UAB School of Medicine-Central Alabama 500,000
2367 Regional Campus
2368 (10) University of Alabama at Birmingham 5,052,527
2369 Cancer Center
2370 (c) Operations and Maintenance and 81,513,659 141,106,395 222,620,054
2371 Program Support for the
2372 University of Alabama in
2373 Huntsville
2374 (1) Alabama Office of the State 850,000
2375 Climatologist
2376 (2) Redstone Research Retention Program 2,700,000
2377 (d) Special Mental Health and 4,236,628 4,236,628
2378 Chauncey Sparks Center for
2379 Developmental and Learning
2380 Disorders, University of Alabama
2381 at Birmingham
2382 (e) Auxiliary Enterprises 349,720,516 349,720,516
2383 (f) Restricted Funds 854,158,184 854,158,184
Page 89

(f) Restricted Funds 854,158,184 854,158,184
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2384 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2385 (1) ETF 809,655,463
2386 (2) Federal and Other Funds 7,395,849,644
2387 Total Alabama, The University of, Board 809,655,463 7,395,849,644 8,205,505,107
2388 of Trustees
2389 5. Athens State University, Board of
2390 Trustees:
2391 (a) Operations and Maintenance and 24,575,048 25,896,523 50,471,571
2392 Program Support
2393 (1) Arts Center 356,455
2394 (2) Center for Excellence in Education 325,000
2395 Development
2396 (3) Collaboration Program with the Alabama 275,000
2397 Community College System
2398 (4) Smart Valley Program 150,000
2399 (b) Auxiliary Enterprises 900,000 900,000
2400 (c) Restricted Funds 26,418,028 26,418,028
2401 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2402 (1) ETF 24,575,048
2403 (2) Federal and Other Funds 53,214,551
2404 Total Athens State University, Board of 24,575,048 53,214,551 77,789,599
2405 Trustees
2406 6. Auburn University, Board of
2407 Trustees:
2408 (a) Operations and Maintenance and 308,544,633 973,969,857 1,282,514,490
2409 Program Support, Auburn
2410 University
2411 (1) CLT Outreach and Research 940,125
2412 The above appropriation for CLT Outreach and Research shall be used for capital expenses and
2413 equipment and shall not be used for salaries and benefits.
Page 90

equipment and shall not be used for salaries and benefits.
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2414 a. College of Architecture, Design and 250,000
2415 Construction
2416 For CLT equipment purchases.
2417 (2) McCrary Institute 1,000,000
2418 (3) National Livestock Competition 250,000
2419 Coordinator
2420 For the recruitment and retention of a National Livestock Competition Coordinator for the
2421 College of Agriculture.
2422 (4) Poultry Science Department 250,000
2423 (5) Irrigation Research and Outreach 500,000
2424 Initiative
2425 (b) Operations and Maintenance and 46,031,398 6,451,500 52,482,898
2426 Program Support, Alabama
2427 Agricultural Experiment Station
2428 (c) Operations and Maintenance and 48,466,499 1,739,228 50,205,727
2429 Program Support, Alabama
2430 Cooperative Extension System
2431 (1) 4-H Youth Development Agricultural and 125,000
2432 Animal Sciences Extension Specialist
2433 (d) Operations and Maintenance and 36,598,473 53,485,227 90,083,700
2434 Program Support, Auburn
2435 University at Montgomery
2436 (1) Senior Resource Center 114,915
2437 (e) Restricted Funds 303,013,668 303,013,668
2438 (f) Auxiliary Enterprises 285,453,550 285,453,550
2439 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2440 (1) ETF 439,641,003
2441 (2) Federal and Other Funds 1,624,113,030
2442 Total Auburn University, Board of 439,641,003 1,624,113,030 2,063,754,033
2443 Trustees
Page 91

439,641,003 1,624,113,030 2,063,754,033
Trustees
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2444 7. Jacksonville State University,
2445 Board of Trustees:
2446 (a) Operations and Maintenance and 65,608,021 130,913,380 196,521,401
2447 Program Support
2448 (1) Center for Applied Forensics 500,000
2449 (2) Center for Law Enforcement Best 475,000
2450 Practices
2451 (3) Center for Manufacturing Support 700,000
2452 (4) Economic Development Initiative for the 425,000
2453 Alabama Scenic River Trail
2454 (5) Little River Canyon Field School 450,000
2455 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any amount appropriated to Jacksonville
2456 State University for the Little River Canyon Field School, for the fiscal year ending September
2457 30, 2026, which is unexpended shall remain at Jacksonville State University to be expended for
2458 the Little River Canyon Field School.
2459 (6) Correctional Professional Training 150,000
2460 (7) Paint Rock Valley Genetic Research 320,000
2461 (8) Sweet Trails Alabama 550,000
2462 (b) Auxiliary Enterprises 26,641,858 26,641,858
2463 (c) Restricted Funds 83,690,040 83,690,040
2464 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2465 (1) ETF 65,608,021
2466 (2) Federal and Other Funds 241,245,278
2467 Total Jacksonville State University, 65,608,021 241,245,278 306,853,299
2468 Board of Trustees
2469 8. Montevallo, University of, Board of
2470 Trustees:
2471 (a) Operations and Maintenance and 34,874,394 41,687,007 76,561,401
2472 Program Support
2473 (1) Allied Health 1,500,000
Page 92

(1) Allied Health 1,500,000
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2474 (2) Purchase Books and Materials for 50,000
2475 Disadvantaged Students
2476 (3) Rural Teacher Recruitment 350,000
2477 (4) Mental and Physical Health Initiatives 50,000
2478 (b) Auxiliary Enterprises 11,964,769 11,964,769
2479 (c) Restricted Funds 6,826,461 6,826,461
2480 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2481 (1) ETF 34,874,394
2482 (2) Federal and Other Funds 60,478,237
2483 Total Montevallo, University of, Board 34,874,394 60,478,237 95,352,631
2484 of Trustees
2485 9. North Alabama, University of, Board
2486 of Trustees:
2487 (a) Operations and Maintenance and 61,135,950 111,850,888 172,986,838
2488 Program Support
2489 (1) North Alabama Trails and Recreation 200,000
2490 (b) Auxiliary Enterprises 22,774,971 22,774,971
2491 (c) Restricted Funds 3,953,817 3,953,817
2492 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2493 (1) ETF 61,135,950
2494 (2) Federal and Other Funds 138,579,676
2495 Total North Alabama, University of, 61,135,950 138,579,676 199,715,626
2496 Board of Trustees
2497 10. South Alabama, University of, Board
2498 of Trustees:
2499 (a) Operations and Maintenance and 181,251,844 1,266,502,059 1,447,753,903
2500 Program Support
2501 (1) ALS Center for Excellence 750,000
2502 (2) Rural Hospitals Resource Center 1,250,000
2503 (3) USA Trauma Center 2,000,000
Page 93

(3) USA Trauma Center 2,000,000
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2504 (b) Auxiliary Enterprises 36,327,203 36,327,203
2505 (c) Restricted Funds 102,600,000 102,600,000
2506 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2507 (1) ETF 181,251,844
2508 (2) Federal and Other Funds 1,405,429,262
2509 Total South Alabama, University of, 181,251,844 1,405,429,262 1,586,681,106
2510 Board of Trustees
2511 11. Troy University, Board of Trustees:
2512 (a) Operations and Maintenance and 92,420,654 162,352,138 254,772,792
2513 Program Support
2514 (1) Dothan Pre-K Teacher Training Center 475,000
2515 (2) Sign Language Interpretive Center 450,000
2516 (3) Center for Civics Education and 1,000,000
2517 Leadership
2518 (4) Civics Partnership 750,000
2519 In collaboration with American Village.
2520 (5) College of Engineering 700,000
2521 (b) Auxiliary Enterprises 22,219,738 22,219,738
2522 (c) Restricted Funds 41,590,845 41,590,845
2523 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2524 (1) ETF 92,420,654
2525 (2) Federal and Other Funds 226,162,721
2526 Total Troy University, Board of 92,420,654 226,162,721 318,583,375
2527 Trustees
2528 12. West Alabama, University of, Board
2529 of Trustees:
2530 (a) Operations and Maintenance and 37,106,748 54,551,903 91,658,651
2531 Program Support
2532 (1) Blackbelt Scholars Program 750,000
2533 (2) Cahaba Biodiversity Center 225,000
Page 94

(2) Cahaba Biodiversity Center 225,000
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2534 (3) National Young Farmers 50,000
2535 (4) Rural Workforce Development 400,000
2536 (5) Women's Hall of Fame 10,000
2537 (b) Auxiliary Enterprises 6,801,185 6,801,185
2538 (c) Restricted Funds 705,864 705,864
2539 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2540 (1) ETF 37,106,748
2541 (2) Federal and Other Funds 62,058,952
2542 Total West Alabama, University of, 37,106,748 62,058,952 99,165,700
2543 Board of Trustees
2544 13. West Alabama, University of, Board
2545 of Trustees-Stillman College:
2546 (a) University of West 100,000 100,000
2547 Alabama-Stillman College
2548 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2549 (1) ETF 100,000
2550 Total West Alabama, University of, 100,000 100,000
2551 Board of Trustees-Stillman College
2552 D. Alabama Innovation Fund:
2553 1. Alabama Innovation Fund:
2554 (a) Alabama Innovation Fund 28,420,133 28,420,133
2555 The above appropriation shall be used for economic development and research
2556 purposes recommended by the Secretary of the Alabama Department of Commerce
2557 and approved by the Governor. The Secretary of the Department of Commerce
2558 shall notify the Chairs of the Senate Finance and Taxation-Education Committee
2559 and the House Ways and Means-Education Committee in writing at least 10 days
2560 prior to the disbursement of any funds. Such notification shall include the
2561 project description and the amount to be disbursed.
2562 (1) Innovate Alabama 20,000,000
2563 (2) Neurological Research Project 1,000,000
Page 95

(2) Neurological Research Project 1,000,000
SB141 INTRODUCED
Education
Trust Fund Other Funds Total
2564 (3) Hudson Alpha Institute for 1,000,000
2565 Biotechnology
2566 (4) Small Business Innovation Research and 5,000,000
2567 Small Business Technology Matching
2568 Grants
2569 Pursuant to the provisions of Article 21 of Chapter 10 of Title 41.
2570 (5) Southern Research Institute 1,000,000
2571 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2572 (1) ETF 28,420,133
2573 Total Alabama Innovation Fund 28,420,133 28,420,133
2574 E. Other:
2575 1. Deaf and Blind, Alabama Institute
2576 for, Board of Trustees:
2577 (a) Adult Programs 18,980,259 10,718,053 29,698,312
2578 (1) Birmingham Regional Office 10,000
2579 (b) Children and Youth Programs 52,579,603 16,568,112 69,147,715
2580 (c) Industries for the Blind 13,595,197 27,394,000 40,989,197
2581 SOURCE OF FUNDS:
2582 (1) ETF 85,155,059
2583 (2) Federal and Local Funds 54,680,165
2584 Total Deaf and Blind, Alabama Institute 85,155,059 54,680,165 139,835,224
2585 for, Board of Trustees
2586 It is the intent of the Legislature for the Alabama Institute for the Deaf and Blind
2587 to ensure that each step of each salary schedule for each type of educational
2588 classroom support personnel provides an hourly rate of not less than $15 per hour,
2589 based on the number of contract days and number of hours per day required by the job
2590 description for that class and type of employee.
2591
Page 96

SB141 INTRODUCED
2592
2593 Section 4. Any state agency, local board of education,
2594 or public institution of higher education receiving funding
2595 from the Education Trust Fund in this appropriations act shall
2596 be in compliance with the provisions of Act 2024-34 of the
2597 2024 Regular Session of the Legislature.
2598 Section 5. In addition to the appropriations herein
2599 made, all gifts, grants, contributions, insurance proceeds or
2600 entitlements, in excess of the amount carried in this act,
2601 including grants by the Congress of the United States,
2602 municipalities or counties, to any department, division,
2603 board, bureau, commission, agency, institution, office or
2604 officer of the State of Alabama are hereby appropriated and,
2605 in the event the same are recurring, are reappropriated to
2606 such department, division, board, bureau, commission, agency,
2607 institution, office, or officer to be used only for the
2608 purpose or purposes for which the grant or contribution was or
2609 shall be made. Further, all state, county, municipal, and
2610 educational entities are authorized to disburse such sums as
2611 deemed necessary by mutual agreement between said entities and
2612 the State of Alabama, Department of Examiners of Public
2613 Accounts to partially defray the cost of auditing services
2614 performed by said agency. All such sums are hereby
2615 appropriated and reappropriated if necessary to the Department
Page 97

appropriated and reappropriated if necessary to the Department
SB141 INTRODUCED
2616 of Examiners of Public Accounts for audit services, to be
2617 expended through the fund established by Section 41-5A-22,
2618 Code of Alabama 1975.
2619 Section 6. The State Superintendent of Education shall
2620 make requisitions to the State Comptroller in favor of the
2621 proper beneficiary in accordance with the law and rules and
2622 regulations governing the expenditure or disbursement of any
2623 and all funds appropriated to the State Department of
2624 Education and/or the State Board of Education in this act,
2625 whereupon the Comptroller shall issue her warrant therefor.
2626 All other appropriations in this act shall be paid after
2627 proper requisitions are made to the State Comptroller in the
2628 manner now provided by law.
2629 Section 7. Nothing in this act shall be construed to
2630 affect or repeal any law authorizing or permitting any
2631 college, school, or other education or eleemosynary
2632 institution of the State to receive, collect or disburse any
2633 fees, tuitions, charges, sales, endowments, trusts or income
2634 therefrom, which are now or may hereafter be authorized to
2635 receive, collect, or disburse. The receiving college, school
2636 or institution shall further maintain separate accounts for
2637 such receipts or shall maintain a system of accounting which
2638 will show a cash flow of such receipts received under the
2639 provision of this appropriation.
2640 Section 8. The appropriations made herein to the
2641 departments, boards, offices, commissions, and agencies
2642 include the amounts necessary and said departments, boards,
Page 98

include the amounts necessary and said departments, boards,
SB141 INTRODUCED
2643 offices, commissions, and agencies are hereby directed to make
2644 the transfer of funds to the State Personnel Department in the
2645 amounts enumerated in the general appropriations act for the
2646 fiscal year ending September 30, 2027. All agencies and
2647 institutions enumerated in this act that receive services from
2648 other governmental agencies enumerated in this act or the
2649 general appropriations act shall make full payment in a timely
2650 manner for such services.
2651 Section 9. All encumbered balances of a previous
2652 fiscal year appropriation other than the exclusions authorized
2653 by the Code of Alabama 1975, Section 41-4-93, shall lapse no
2654 later than September 30 of the fiscal year immediately
2655 following the fiscal year for which the appropriation was made
2656 and shall revert to the credit of the Education Trust Fund or
2657 earmarked fund from which the appropriation or appropriations
2658 were made.
2659 Section 10. Upon certification to the Director of
2660 Finance by the State Attorney General that a federal court has
2661 ordered the State of Alabama to pay claims, attorney fees, or
2662 other costs relating to said court order, funds are hereby
2663 appropriated to the affected department, board, bureau, or
2664 commission in the amount necessary to satisfy that court
2665 order. Such appropriations are in addition to any other
2666 appropriation heretofore or hereafter made in this
2667 appropriation act. Such appropriations are conditioned upon
2668 the availability of funds and a determination by the Director
2669 of Finance that other current appropriations are not available
Page 99

of Finance that other current appropriations are not available
SB141 INTRODUCED
2670 for court-ordered payments.
2671 Section 11. Local boards of education may exercise
2672 flexibility among line item expenditures, not to create a
2673 reduction of earned teacher units and/or local board of
2674 education support personnel.
2675 Section 12. The State Superintendent of Education may
2676 approve a request by a local board of education for
2677 redirecting Other Current Expense funds designated for
2678 pass-through calculations to their local Child Nutrition
2679 Program if the redirected funds do not prevent the Child
2680 Nutrition Program of that local board of education from
2681 maintaining a one-month fund balance.
2682 Section 13. The appropriations made herein to the
2683 departments, boards, offices, commissions, and agencies
2684 include the amounts necessary to pay the State Employees'
2685 Insurance Board (SEIB). The SEIB rate shall be $1,175 per
2686 month for each full-time employee for the fiscal year ending
2687 September 30, 2027. The State Employees' Insurance Board will
2688 adjust the insurance program wherever appropriate to maintain
2689 the aforementioned fixed rate.
2690 Section 14. Notwithstanding any other provisions of
2691 this act or any other act, any amount from appropriations for
2692 the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026 to the various state
2693 agencies and institutions in this act, including
2694 appropriations from the Education Trust Fund, which are
2695 unexpended and reverted on September 30, 2026 are hereby
2696 reappropriated to the respective state agencies, offices, and
Page 100

reappropriated to the respective state agencies, offices, and
SB141 INTRODUCED
2697 institutions for the fiscal year beginning October 1, 2026.
2698 Section 15. The At-Risk and High Hopes appropriations
2699 made to the State Department of Education shall be expended at
2700 the discretion of the State Superintendent of Education, with
2701 input from other Alabama State Department of Education
2702 advisory personnel, for activities or programs designed to
2703 enhance outcomes for At-Risk Students. In an effort to provide
2704 the best and most efficient implementation, administration of
2705 the funds shall be assigned to and allocated by the Alabama
2706 State Department of Education's Division of Administrative and
2707 Financial Support.
2708 Section 16. (a) All nongovernmental entities,
2709 identified by the Legislative Services Agency, which are
2710 allocated funds in Section 3 of this act shall file a report
2711 with the Chairs of the House Ways and Means-Education
2712 Committee, the Senate Committee on Finance and
2713 Taxation-Education, Finance Director, and the Legislative
2714 Fiscal Officer prior to the start of the 2027 Regular Session,
2715 regarding the proposed expenditures and usage of the funds
2716 appropriated in the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027. The
2717 Legislative Services Agency shall provide notice to the
2718 identified nongovernmental entities within 60 days following
2719 enactment of this act regarding the reporting requirements and
2720 the methodology to submit reports and format to be used, which
2721 may include an online platform.
2722 (b) In the event an entity was appropriated funds from
2723 the Education Trust Fund in the fiscal year ending September
Page 101

the Education Trust Fund in the fiscal year ending September
SB141 INTRODUCED
2724 30, 2026, the entity shall also include in its report a
2725 detailed breakdown of the expenditure and use of those funds,
2726 including an inventory of the services delivered and number of
2727 clients served, pursuant to guidelines established by the
2728 Legislative Services Agency.
2729 Section 17. The State Superintendent of Education
2730 shall notify each local superintendent and finance officer of
2731 each local education agency by email regarding the
2732 availability and application process, including any required
2733 forms, for any available grant opportunities during FY 2027.
2734 The State Superintendent shall notify all members of the local
2735 legislative delegation five days prior to the announcement of
2736 any grant made to any entity located in the legislative
2737 jurisdiction. The five days prior notice requirement shall be
2738 waived in the event of a declared emergency. The Governor
2739 shall encourage the Department to disburse the funds provided
2740 herein on a nondiscriminatory basis.
2741 Section 18. Except as may be herein otherwise
2742 provided, amounts herein specifically appropriated shall be in
2743 lieu of the amounts heretofore provided or appropriated by law
2744 for such purposes. The amounts herein appropriated are the
2745 maximum amounts to be expended for the purposes herein
2746 designated and in no event shall the maximum expenditure
2747 provided for any items of expense exceed the amount allocated
2748 herein except as may be further provided for under this act,
2749 as provided in the Budget Management Act of 1976, Sections
2750 41-19-1, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975, and those
Page 102

41-19-1, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975, and those
SB141 INTRODUCED
2751 appropriations herein made are and shall be subject to terms,
2752 conditions, provisions and limitations of Sections 41-4-80, et
2753 seq., Code of Alabama 1975, and the Budget Management Act of
2754 1976, Sections 41-19-1, et seq., Code of Alabama 1975.
2755 Section 19. In addition to all appropriations
2756 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
2757 such amounts as may be necessary for public funds transferred
2758 into the State Treasury, in accordance with Executive Order
2759 No. 726.
2760 Section 20. If any section, paragraph, sentence,
2761 clause, provision, or portion of this act or all or any
2762 portion of the appropriations herein made is held
2763 unconstitutional or invalid, it shall not affect any other
2764 section, paragraph, sentence, clause, provision, or portion of
2765 this act or any other appropriation or appropriations or
2766 portion thereof hereby made not in and of itself
2767 unconstitutional or invalid.
2768 Section 21. All laws or parts of laws, general,
2769 special, private, or local in conflict with or inconsistent
2770 with the provisions of this act are hereby expressly repealed.
2771 Section 22. This act shall become effective on October
2772 1, 2026.
Page 103